BTW, does anyone know where that chemise dress/sack dress thing came from? Was it Dior, was it Balenciaga? How long did it last?
If the mass rollout of the TSA’s occupying army of minimum wage morons is not abated, Americans will have to get used to being interrogated, frisked and treated like criminals by TSA goons on a regular basis, meaning the United States’ transformation into a Soviet-style police state festooned with internal checkpoints will be complete.
With the much talked about rule changes of banned refuelling, narrower front tyres and no wheel fairings, the teams are packed into a tightly competitive bunch. Or perhaps its fairer to say three bunches, as Ferrari, McLaren, Mercedes and Red Bull fight for the front positions, the new teams will bring up the rear, sandwiching a mid field almost too close to separate on pace. Certainly a bumper year for F1 and no doubt some bumping going on over the opening laps as the drivers vie to make their mark early in the season.
What perhaps misses most are fresh vegetables. However, little niceties are generally only a postage stamp away.
How does a contempt proceeding against the executive branch work?
Decide what you are training for. What is your personal goal? If you are doing an endurance event, of course you need to do long slow steady state aerobics to build your capacity. Otherwise you simply won’t achieve your goal.
The Royal Coronation was kicked off by me crowning six deserving ladies and asking them to go forth throughout the Blogdom and crown other worthy subjects. The Court is pleased to present to you the first 16 members of the Royal Court. Though they have not demanded that you pay taxes when visiting their Blogdoms, they do adore comments and will work hard to keep all of their royal subjects happy so long as they feel appreciated. And when you visit my sister Queens, please be sure to tell them that Queen Cindy sent you!
You can use whatever kind of noodles you like - just plain old thin spaghetti would work fine. I used Barilla Pasta Plus, partly because I'm trying to be healthy, and partly because I like the texture and chew. I might try these with some kind of an asian noodle if I run across some at the store. Even if I never do these are going to become a staple at our house!
So the other night, Ray and I were going to see sunset at our usual spot because we were feeling lazy. Just as we pulled up, Ray totally balked and suggested we go someplace else, because ‘the creepy man’ was there.
It’s just that, I read a lot of gossip blogs and I certainly don’t see the extent of celebrity fashion parading around Bonnaroo, Lolapalooza, or the lesser known Sasquatch in our very own PNW. If everyone wants to dress up like a slutty Woodstock flashback at Coachella, why don’t I have the pleasure of seeing the same ding dongs putting on flannels and grungy Doc Martins for Lolapalooa?
Dr. Christof Lehmann
It is being reported that the Raiders are interested in the services of both Matt Leinart and Jim Sorgi to backup starter Carson Palmer. This backup position has been identified as a need all offseason, but GM Reggie McKenzie waited, knowing that there were many options that could be had for cheaper as OTAs approached. Project Terrelle Pryor and unkown Rhett Bomar are the only other quarterbacks currently on the roster, so it makes sense to be shopping for a veteran backup. Leinart and Sorgi come from different backgrounds but have had similarly unproductive NFL careers. Here’s a look at each guy.
This link would allow him to play with a freedom he enjoyed at Everton and with Scotland, utilising his eye for a pass, ability to create goals in big moments and a keen work ethic.
I suppose it depends why you blog really.
Irrespective of the fact that I go off blogging for long intervals, April marks the anniversary month for Flavours and Tastes. I created the blog on a whim when Laavanya sent the link to her blog. Initially I wanted to follow and try recipes from bloggers. Then as I wanted to record a few recipes for my daughter and few of her friends, I made posts and from thereon it has been a very happy blogging experience. Today i count myself blessed that I have many friends through this tiny space that I interact virtually.
These will make you feel like you are eating a healthy dessert even though there is 1 cup of butter hidden beneath.
I could come up with some long convoluted excuse for why I haven’t been on WordPress lately. For example I could say that I decided to adopt 17 Somali children while I was on holiday and as result I haven’t had a moment’s peace. But that would be a lie because Madonna beat me to it. The truth is reality has had my undivided attention of late and consequently my storytelling has had to take a backseat. On the plus side at least I’m using the backseat for something other than sex for a change. I guess I did say that out loud. Oh well.
Using a carnivorous plant for the planned prank seemed the perfect payback for his blood-sucking boss.
They were actually fairly in-depth. The biggest change was the ending. I'd tell you more--but don't want to give anything away.The rest of the revisions had to do with pacing and information control and fleshing out some of the characters. In all, it took me about three weeks to do the revisions, which is a long time for me (I wrote ORIGIN in four weeks).
1/3 cup Worcestershire sauce
Friday morning dawns, without any sleep. Two medics from Durban do not show up, two from North Coast and 3 from Pietermaritzburg. I am left with 20. Not quite what I was hoping for, but manageable all the same. I hate myself for doubting in the first place. However, I am the only paramedic, and should we have to move a serious patient, the event will be left with nothing but ambulance staff. It will just have to do! By 10am the patients are starting to arrive. Flu, runny tummy, asthma, allergy, silly things that mean a lot to the patient, but are not what we are trained for. We need the serious stuff to make our life worth while….. A Provincial Ambulance response vehicle pulls up with a doctor, required by Disaster Management to be in the OPS CENTER in case of disaster.
Here is the variety they have to pick from. They can mix and match this week.
We once found ourselves rather spectacularly lost on Hampstead Heath. It was a damp, drizzly November day. H and I had decided upon an afternoon amble as part of my 31st celebrations. The idea of a bracing walk had seemed like a good one. Not when we found ourselves in a directional muddle and at the mercy of our map reading skills. The icy drizzle morphed into vengeful rain pellets that targeted us with missilic gusto. Then the swift arrival of an inky dusk mid afternoon sent us into a tail spin. Tree branches that had offered a protective canopy in the daylight now clawed menacingly over our heads. There was no one else about but our nervous selves as we trudged aimlessly round and round the same path. It all got a little Blair Witch. After an hour we eventually found the exit and the reassuring sight of H's car. Still the afternoon had not been not in vain. It made several generous servings of victoria sponge and a mug of strong brew back at H's taste all the more sweeter.
Applications for Funding
But these romantic movies never really get to the meat and guts about what it is we really crave for in men. It’s a lot easier to portray a man as catering to a woman than it is showing a man in his natural masculine state pursuing a woman and successfully getting that raw attraction from her vs. the contrived IDEALS that women are taught to want in men.
I won't lie, it was a pain in the butt pivoting the quilt at the end of each point - no way I'd use this design for anything bigger than a baby quilt.
I think that my Opus is awkward but Flux turned out pretty well. I'm proudest of my shading on Flux. It turned out pretty well if I do say so myself. I had started this tile with a pretty tight string but as I added Flux, the whole string went out the window. I'm finding myself ignoring my string lately. Often I use the string as a defining point of the tile. Like a coloring book, I usually stick to the lines and don't really stray beyond them. I have been working on relaxing that a bit and fear that I am starting to swing the other way.
Police Sergeant – supervise teams of officers, overseeing police operations, volume crime investigations, demand management issues and take initial control of critical incidents.
Geek Outlaw: If you could have ANY character written for yourself to play in the entire Star Trek universe, what would they be like? Name? Race? Background? Association? Personality? Level of Bad-Ass-ness?
Clara Gardner has recently learned that she's part angel. Having angel blood run through her veins not only makes her smarter, stronger, and faster than humans (a word, she realizes, that no longer applies to her), but it means she has a purpose, something she was put on this earth to do. Figuring out what that is, though, isn't easy.
Blimey ... I am getting really really bad at this blogging lark! Not only have I not updated it ... but I have n't even checked in this week ... not once ... so my poor blog is feeling very neglected! Even my side bar is about twenty years out of date! I really MUST make more of an effort!
This always has been, and always will be, a blog for writers to learn and share their experiences. One of the reasons I never switched my blog format to something more crisp and "professional" looking, is because I want people to feel at ease here. I want you to feel you can express yourself, share your joys and your pains, without fear of being looked down on by some hotsy-totsy big-shot author/blog-owner. This isn't a prestigious university, it's more like a study group that meets at someone's house.
Fibromyalgia is this decade’s Epstein-Barr – and it seems that it’s a continuance of the Chronic Fatigue
What I really love about this stamp set is that there are 3 strips to make easy backgrounds that all coordinate together! LOVE that!! I stamped the largest hexagon in Hawaiian Shores ink, the next size in New Leaf ink and the inside solid hexagon with Berry Sorbet ink. I have to say that I LOVE these new inks! After I stamped the rows of hexagons I ran the whole piece through my Big Shot with the Moroccan Motifs Impression Plate.
In addition, I learned a great lesson about the importance of changing the rules of the game to help define boundaries a little better. My biggest failure this year was probably my major quarterly book project, which wasn’t always very well structured. As a result, students failed to approve books for projects and often threw projects together at the last minute (especially projects that involved drawing or sketching), trying to manipulate the guidelines set in order to do virtually no work at all to get credit for the project. As a testament to this: my wife helped me clean up my room today, and she picked up one such project and remarked incredulously, “They actually turned this in for a project?” So I know next year to set different guidelines for book approvals (by midterm, I think) and to put far more stringent limits on the projects that can be done, in addition to enforcing them early on. (Fortunately, only one class – the sophomores going into their junior year – will have this project with me next year, so that limits the number of students who will have to learn these significant changes.)
Thanksgiving dinner went well. It was a gluttony fest and I was happy to share it with E yet another year. The sticky rice stuffing I adored but E felt it was too sweet. Maybe I overdid the quantity of Chinese sausage or the soy. I'll continue to have to work to tweak the recipe. But now we own a huge bag of sticky rice so maybe I'll work on my rice pudding recipes next? I have a lovely one that calls for coconut milk, dried sour cherries and mangoes that I haven't made in a while.
Passengers spoke of people landing on top of each other after the Florida-bound Virgin plane was evacuated at Gatwick having had to turn back to the West Sussex airport on Monday.
Wednesday, April 25 at 7:00 pm Best Sex Writing 2012 reading Join Best Sex Writing 2012 editor Rachel Kramer Bussel and contributors Camille Dodero, Ellen Friedrichs, Lynn Harris, Amanda Marcotte, Joan Price, Abby Tallmer, and Rachel Rabbit White for readings from this year's collection of the best journalism and essays about sexuality and a Q&A on wide-ranging topics, include SlutWalks, aging and sexuality, teenagers and sex laws, dating sites for people with STDs, drag shows, men who prefer fat women, and the gentrification of the West Village. Free and free cupcakes. Housing Works Bookstore Cafe proceeds go toward the fight to end AIDS and homelessness. Housing Works Bookstore Cafe, 126 Crosby Street, NYC
Tidy Main Vocalist: (D.O.)Their official debut represented the beginning of a life together, of course the cleanliness of the dorm has also become everybody’s concern. ”In our group, D.O. is the tidiest, when you go to his room, and open his drawers, I promise you all of his clothing and possessions are neatly arranged, and he will even have his shirts organized by different colors and styles. But I’m not saying the other members are not organized!”-Sehun
And remember (if you live where it gets cold in winter), to dry out your orange rinds in the sun, to use as fire starters and to scent your home with lovely orange on a cold winters day..
New job, warrior of light, Mihile!
I know folks--lots of them--who say they'd never carry openly. Hallelujah and pass the cornbread, it's a free country and that's your choice. But try not to make YOUR choice more important than MY choice.
2 produce
was pleasing him . She worked her mouth up and down genlty yet hard
“There cannot be stable money within an environment dominated by ideologies hostile to the preservation of economic freedom.” – Ludwig von Mises
Study 5. Previous work had shown that even making people read something in a hard-to-read font improved their performance on analytical-thinking tests relative to the same thing presented in an easy-to read font. So they asked students to just rate their religiosity, but using questions presented in either “hard” or “easy” fonts. Here’s some samples they give:
decency that one would expect from neighbours.
Being a mother can be all-consuming. It can be difficult. It can be wonderful. And these women are showing us all the different facets on a daily basis. We've had a military wife, an adoptive mom, a mother of an autistic son, and so many more.
It's also the sole piece of writing I wish no one had to read at all.
Spanish - Leave please go of my failure of pull
To get there, take the 210 Freeway to Altadena Drive. Head north about two miles, passing a park and several lights along the way. As you pass New York Drive, you'll see the entrance to Eaton Canyon Nature Center on your right. You might choose to park there and visit the nature center or take some of the nature trails down there. However, if your destination is Mount Wilson, continuing north will knock two miles off your hike.
The 2011-12 champions started the second period brightly after Gonzalo Higuain replaced Kaka and Xabi Alonso came in for Sahin, and they came close to the equaliser on 58 minutes. Marcelo’s cross-field delivery evaded the Granada defence and found Benzema on the right side of the box. The Frenchman took one touch to bring the ball under his control before smashing it towards the top corner from a narrow angle; a shot which Cesar was equal to, parrying the ball out for a corner.
What else can one do to defeat a popular incumbent?
Stoop and stretch, scratch and yawn,
The idea of having a very large TV on the wall is a very impressive idea. The problem is that there are issues that come when a person decides to do this feat and many just give up and put it in the entertainment center or on the TV stand. The answer to this question is really one of personal preference and just how much work you want to put into mounting the HDTV on the wall.
Perils of Love from Penny Black 4132K
This is what it feels like to be back at home.
Cases Made: 823
I don't enjoy the fact that all my plans in life, like travelling, studying, exercising, starting my career; have to be on hold for a long time or organised to suit everyone else.
So I have come to this conclusion: all language coaches should spend time in a country who's language they not only do not speak, but who's language is absolutely nothing like...almost any other language in the world. I'm thinking that that next workshop should be in either Latvia or Estonia.
I’ve said who I am, but I don’t think people understand what kind of animal I might be. I’m Matthew Sawyer, but I’ve tried telling that to everyone. In schemes larger than myself, I’m nobody from nowhere. I’ve got no awards or accreditation. No one has recognized me beyond a few people buying my books and far fewer saying anything about me in forums – good or evil. My writing has been called evil, but I’m certain that is simply a misunderstanding. I admit, I write about evil and it is the very crux of my creativity. All the same, my writing is not evil. For the sake of argumentative candidness, I feel it’s gospel and I am quite righteous about my homunculus. That’s not to say my craft-work is perfect. I am always cutting off warts and incising grammar errors and typos.
SPIDER AND SPIDER WEB
Recent musings in the trade press here and here have asked us when are publicans going to get their voices heard. Previously I've suggested that the British Guild of Beer Writers may be the answer, with Melissa Cole's quest to spread the word about ale to new audiences, and Pete Browns constant critical eye on mainstream press stories and health lobby releases.
It was a weird day at work- for one, to go from 70 hours a week to 30 hours a week is quite strange, but to have to try and cram 8-9 hours worth of work into 5.5 hours is messed up! So it was a strange day and I got home and it was still light out which was weird. I go to check the mail (looking for more jewelry supplies I ordered) and there was a Rolling Stone mag. So I look at it, thinking it was the kid upstair's mag, and I notice it's got my name on it. I never read Rolling Stone- BUST mag only here- so I would never have ordered it, but I recognize the Lennon cover as a recent issue I happened to leaf through while at work over the holidays.
Mini Speaker Guide – Enjoy Music on Your iPod With Quality Powered Speakers
The goal for the day was to use as many embellishments as I could without making the page look cluttered.
On an unrelated note, I'm typing this on my iPad. Using both a touch screen and an external keyboard is different--I have to stop and think occassionally about doing something that would be obvious with a mouse. But I'm sure it will soon be second nature. It's funny to see how many iPads are here, too--at least half a dozen spotted so far among 22 people.
We've forgotten the men and women who burned to death or suffocated in the Pentagon. We've forgotten our promises, our vows, our commitments.
"Sorry, Rachel mumbled.
This Mother's Day I cannot help to think about Christ's sacrifice to make our adoption into God's family possible. Maybe it's because just a few weeks ago we were celebrating Easter, but I'm reminded anew that my gain required His loss, His pain. The greatest love, it seems, is not shown with flowers, chocolate or a diamond bracelet. The greatest love is shown when, because of your love for another, your desires and comfort are laid down for the greater good of someone else.
Connor and Elsa were being all very huggy and cosy and close together tonight. So were Sophia and Jon were also being quite huggy. It just made me more irritated, I felt sick and and angry to look at them. A lot of it is fuelled by jealousy I think. All I want is something like what they have, is that too much to ask? I’m almost fed up of Phoebe, Sian and Katie moaning about their break-ups. A break up wouldn’t necessarily be the greatest thing, but it’s not like I can even have had one because I’ve never been with someone. All I want is to be with Heather, or Melissa, or someone I care about who cares about me back. That’s all. Just a nice, normal relationship. Even one where we fight a bit, just SOMETHING! :( Sybie was saying it had been 6 months since she had broken up with her boyfriend, and she still hadn’t even thought about getting a new BF. I do like Sybie, and she is the right height for me ;) I just don’t think I fancy her, not in the way I do with Heather, and certainly not in the way I feel about Melissa.
Only Malaysians can do that from within. World leaders only want our cheap commodities and exports, and they will continue to turn a blind eye to Malaysia.
But this year, the corner sat empty. There was no tree. At only 9 years old, Emily didn't understand why they had not put up their traditional tree and where were the Christmas presents?
Colcannon
What was your first experience in programming?
From Time magazine: Somebody "pulled the Negro out of the car by his belt." The drivers ''hit him several times with their fists and knocked him to the ground." One of the drivers pulled out a knife. "Before you kill him," he said, "I want to put the same scars on him that he put on Brown." Said Jessie Lee Sammons: "I could hear the tearing of clothing and flesh."
Welcome to A Monster Ate My Book Report! We found this meme at Ya-aholic, and we thought this is a great thing for us to have a little fun with. It's fun to be creative! Please visit Ya-Aholic to see what other bloggers are wishing for.
Notes on Ingredients: I used Pierre Masson VSOP brandy, a 1:1 simple syrup, and Chateau St. Michelle sparkling wine.
I started with RIN: DAUGHTERS OF MNEMOSYNE because Netflix kept recommending it, because it had solid reviews, and because it was only 6 episodes long. Look, I tried once upon a time to watch Robotech and I couldn’t make it through four episodes, let alone 75. I’m not going to commit to something long-form at the start. Let me get comfortable in the kiddie pool before we go deep sea diving together, okay?
At the time of writing it is the evening of May Bank Holiday, and I am relaxing in my room with a bar of white chocolate that I purchased from the shops yesterday. I’ve not bought white chocolate for myself (or had it bought for me, I must add) since about 2004, so I’m looking forward immensely to finishing this post and digging in.
The wish must be born, at least saying it out loud, but it is much better to write it down on paper, to make it visible.
Today was very productive, a trip to town, Yoga class, paid ATT bills, signed up for Comcast phone service. (Which, combined with the internet and TV we already have, SHOULD result in a savings) I'll believe it when it happens. Then shopping, then a call(via cell phone) that the phone tech was enroute. It took 4 hours and many trips to other places (for the tech) but about 6pm we got our dial tone back. There was a break somewhere else. When I asked earlier on about just using a different pair of wires, I was told they were all full. So more good news, next week there will be a pair available! Tech was very nice.
Say if the banging doesn’t help
The problem is I depend on my computer now. I’ve got things going on online now. I’ve got an Etsy store. I LOVE my laptop! I can sit outside on the deck and type about the beautiful day, or sit in my favorite chair. I dread the day my computer goes down. I could lose stories and my family history. Yikes. I am dependent on computers. I hate that, but I can live with it for now. I can’t imagine what I would have been doing since retirement if I didn’t have my computer.
Then comes an initial solar flare of subatomic particles that resemble a filament coming out of the sun. That part already hit Earth only minutes after the initial burst, bringing radio and radiation disturbances.
My father told me a beautiful story of how they celebrate and reenact Good Friday and Easter in Mallorca, Spain where he lives. First, they choose a young man from the village to portray Christ. Then they choose other villagers to play the Roman soldiers and the two thieves and other important characters.
Raspberry and Limoncello Jelly Tartlet
The reasons for this are clear; the petitioner wanted and needed money, and thus needed to convince the authorities that their need was special. They make interesting reading not just for the language of sickness, but for the ways that it could be deliberately deployed.
Indian lady: “Is that the spiritual master still guiding after the death?
+44 (0)20 7830 4444 (Tel)
For WAB you just build your units mixing them as you like. I recommend about half of the unit in singles for casualty removal.
March 11 Club Congress, Tucson AZ
Since I am intending to HEAL (face it and replace it), I simply look at the issues as strong negative energies that I am pulling out of the core and replacing with loving thoughts, feelings, Reiki and balance. When I help someone heal, I often enter a meditative or trance state, and I plan to do just that tomorrow. I have to admit that I don’t know EXACTLY what caused all of this, but I know where to point my energy and who to ask for help.
Also in pranayama class, we have to say, “mmmmmmmm” like a bee when we breathe out for the bhramari form of praaNaayaama, as well as in some of the yogaasanaas.
The ghostly presence of Winsome’s father and grandfather echo through the Lee-Enfield rifle brought back from the killing fields of Europe, a meditation on violence skilfully woven in. Winsome’s losses and grief never become sentimental despite the often allegorical subtext: even his name suggests contradiction (the imperious ‘Julius’ Caesar, ‘Winsome’ suggesting something more benign). As a quiet madness takes hold, Winsome begins quoting Shakespearean archaisms, the fire crackling and spitting as the world closes in around him.
Here’s the flip side:
a place where clients are met, files are kept, the telephone is answered, mail is received and the attorney or a responsible person acting on the attorney’s behalf can be reached in person and by telephone during normal business hours to answer questions posed by the courts, clients or adversaries and to ensure that competent advice from the attorney can be obtained within a reasonable period of time.
For much of the 1970s, ’80s and ’90s, the most-common cause had been respiratory disease. Now, asthma and breathing problems are No. 6, and deafness and orthopedic impairments don’t even make the list of top conditions.
“A GOOD MAN GOES TO WAR” – Series 6, Episode 7, Story 218a – Written by Steven Moffat; Directed by Peter Hoar – The Eleventh Doctor and Rory raise a … well, it’s not an army as much as it is a collection of costumes, but together they all go storm Demon’s Run in order to save Amy and her baby. And they do. Sort of. And then River shows up and finally tells us her real identity, and it turns out we would have all known this a long time ago except for a silly translation error. Because River Song Is Gamma Forest For Arpeggio Ocean.
Writing this is a triumph of the mind over the dumb insolence of the body.
- Feel free to post about all of the fun and thank your Holly Bloggy partner after Christmas!
Imagine an expensive acoustic guitar, and a
This year’s law enforcement night netted more than $30,000, which will benefit local law enforcement charities.
Some interesting conversations and lots of fun....
"What?" Dr. Dante seemed stunned.
Veteran journalist and columnist MJ Antony considered the impact the move would have on the freedom of the press. “If a report is found to have been in violation of the guidelines, are we going to scrutinise individual paragraphs to prove it? Who will be held liable for the mistake? What is the punishment and what is the remedy?” Besides, he points out that all media organisations have their own code of conduct, besides which exist bodies like the National Broadcast Association and the Press Council of India. Advocate Madhavi Divan, author of Facets of Media Law, a commentary on aspects of media law and its regulation emphasised that the ‘open justice system’ must not be forgotten. “Traditionally, any member of the public could come in and watch court proceedings. The logic of this has been that the public should be allowed to understand the administration of justice. As they say, ‘justice must seem to be done’.”
Life, love, and the stars above!
Use the BEST quality paint, buy extra and skip the matte finish -
Noe being the proud and lucky Grammie that I am, I just have to post this pic from a day at the oceanside here in Nova Scotia yesterday...the cousins frolicking in the surf.
My teachers never stop them even when they heard it going on. They just watched and saw my self-esteem lower. My self-esteem was generally at 1%. Suicide was always on my mind. I tried my parents but they just though I was a wimp for not sticking up for my self. I declared myself depressed and stopped eating in hopes of loosing weight.
I need the saws to take out the tree (now two, one having died or at least failing to come back this spring; the other is leaning where the creek has undercut the roots while in flood). There’s no hurry on those items returning, the work is easier in the creek bottom when its dry, anyway.
Congratulations to all of our TEAM U S A athletes and to all the competitors.
Now, THIS is what God intended when he made music! Why should Christian music be boring? Isn’t it about the most exciting, the most dynamic, the most powerful thing on earth: God & Jesus? I mean, look at how God applied his mind & his talents. Is a sunset boring? Are birds chirping in the morning mist dull? When the trees turn to fire in the autumn sun, do you yawn? Is it punishment to see the underwater world explode into life? Do the colors in cosmic clouds cause you pain? NOO!! They reflect the joyful nature of God’s own heart!
That she’s a beloved friend.
Are things early, late or right on time where you are?
Shut up and give us our money back.
This show is more intense and disturbing than many. And the characters are complex and nuanced…. That’s why it’s good!
I’m a very visual writer. I see everything happening in movies in my head and I write down what I see/hear/feel, etc. In those movies, I see me in both Carley and Mrs. Murphy. Literally. I see myself as if looking in a mirror in both characters. Lynda speaking with Lynda. In fact, as I write, I typically “drop”’ in to all of my characters. Even in writing Michael Eric, the four-year-old boy, I see his world through his eyes—his view of looking upward at others, sitting on the cold tile floor playing with Matchboxes. It’s all a bit odd, I must admit, but I’m grateful for it.
The Waterfall Trail leads past one pretty falls, Upper Nebo Falls, on its way to the main drop, Mount Nebo Falls. Since both are near the top of the mountain the water flow can be low during much of the year, but they are pretty in the early Spring. The collage above was made from pictures I took of the waterfalls during our visit in March, 2009.
In other news, I am teaching a series of classes in Amsterdam this June. If you're in the area please join us - it's going to be a blast (as usual). Check out the Facebook page for more information.
If you hunt and want to express why you hunt, I welcome you to write a post and put your link to in the comments!
This composite image shows the distribution of dark matter, galaxies, and hot gas in the core of the merging galaxy cluster Abell 520, formed from a violent collision of massive galaxy clusters.
When will the Prizes be Drawn?
Any predictions or observations?
The entire garden was filled with the scent of Lord Śrī Kṛṣṇa’s transcendental body. When Srī Caitanya Mahāprabhu smelled it, He fell unconscious at once.
Nowhere Coats was required to finish along with only a few defensemen because Anton Stralman has been bumped out of the online game within the first period of time.
After heaving out both aft cabin beds (despite my having laid fresh clean sheets last night!), Doctor/Captain John spent most of the day under the engine boards. In yogic configurations, his body twisted, sweat poured off his brow, showering down over batteries and carburetors, he worked his magic with voltage metres and cable ties, engines on then off then on again, while I stood by, passing spanners and cutters and the occasional glass of fruit juice.
The question of how to taste that first little sip that the waiter pours in a restaurant came up. The instructor mentioned that the cork is not presented to smell, and before he could finish our experts said, in unison, “No! You don’t smell it, you squeeze it to make sure it's wet,” with requisite hand gestures.
♪ And last, another fauna beauty: a watercolour of a roe deer (capreolus capreolus).
Recent discoveries:
-WILL GRAYSON, WILL GRAYSON by John Green and David Levithan (again, no review required).
The eye is the hammer.
One person was killed and five were wounded on Thursday in fresh clashes between pro- and anti-Syrian regime districts in the north Lebanon port city of Tripoli, a security official said.
I’ve aslo noticed a huge change in your attitude. You talk to me about your day now, you never used to. Before you started here you’d say ‘I don’t know’ when I asked how it went. But now it’s very different, you tell me about it in great detail. You have ‘golden time’ on Fridays, you get to choose an activity that is unrelated to learning, it’s about having fun. So far you’ve played ping-pong, football and today you’re going to dance club. You tell me about phonics, numbers and what you had for lunch. You get to choose your meals every day and I’ve had to tell you to stop eating so much pasta. I asked you to try something different this week and you listened to me, you had a baked potato with tuna.
The more we are together, the lesser we actually merge,
Love with no fear to love.
Last night I went to see the guys from Good Fucking Design Advice speak at AIGA Oklahoma. I almost asked Brian and Jason for a photo but after embarrassing myself in front of Pinterest's Ben Silbermann I decided to play it cool by saying something lame like "Hey. I'm looking forward to your presentation." One of the most fascinating part of this presentation was learning that it was these guys' first!
Why, indeed?
The risk paid off. Having a highly experienced staff member on the team gave us more time to coach the less-experienced employees. It allowed us to develop a stronger team.
Hidden Video Cameras (Spy-Cams)
Once again she smiles
These may be of interest; I do not necessarily agree with opinions expressed in them, although the reasoning and writing are almost always first-rate (and represent a standard seldom, if ever, achieved in "mainstream" journalism). I'm picky, and have eclectic tastes, so don't expect a comprehensive listing.
Needless to say I haven't actually seen Top Gear's "Three Wise Men", and being a Christmas special I expect it'll air here between Easter and late June, but it has already made some news here. And it's all thanks to James May, a rock, a few square yards of black cloth, and bloody Anjem "Is-It-'Coz-I-Is-Slamic" Choudary. It seems that James May brained himself with a rock somehow and that when he came out of hospital, for reasons I don't pretend to understand, this was what he was faced with.
Two pineapple rings, cut into eights.
Just chalk this mistake up as another thorn in Nashville’s side as they fight to regain their footing towards the Stanley Cup.
At present crowd funding is our only source of funding due to the film funding cuts imposed by this new British Government.
Finally… another bit of bollocks coming our way… hence the captioned picture above..
Clayton leaping from log to log, completely out of order thanks to blogger! :p
Great start with delicious food. First game was to randomly pick a card with a topic. If Lee mentioned that topic, the person holding the card won a prize. My topic was "The Olympics". I won while we were at the first bus stop!
It’s the week of the Jack’s and I certainly can’t get enough. Check out both of these new albums as they’ll have you jumpin’ for more.
There is a lot of negativity in this house. I do my best to be positive but it is always negated by ‘shhhh, you know who’.
3) Middle Management societies tend to fail. Jared Diamond in his book Collapse (I promise to do the review soon) alludes to this principle by looking a Polynesian Islands. Generally “small” societies, the ones that are heavy on local power, where everyone is at least familiar with one another even if they don’t all have super-personal relationships, tend to do quite well and can often survive in fixed states even minimal resources for many centuries. Also “large” societies tend to do quite well when there is a supreme ruler; a high king or big chief. Very tightly controlled power tends to create civilizations that endure. The “middle” societies however tend to fail, the civilization where everyone has a say and no one does, where local power is discouraged but the higher ups keep changing often, these societies tend to fail.
Dear Mama
The culmination of everything about this series.
Birdsong and shafts of spring light wake Simone. Ron is nowhere to be seen. She stretches cat like. Shapely legs emerge from beneath the covers as her blind feet feel for slippers. The house is quiet and she relishes the peace as she walks towards the window, opening it wide to allow the sun to kiss her face. “Thank you Jus, for the sleep in…” she whispers
Don't forget Birds of Prey issue 1 is one of our fantastic books of the month. So this means that it is 35% off for anyone but if you have a standing order with us it means you get this book at a whopping 50% off!
put the remainder of the "salmon pancake" on a plate,
A friend posted this article on Facebook: it's about how people are much happier when they change their lifestyles to spend less. In a recent study, researchers found that spending money on "experiences" makes people happier, longer, than buying stuff. "‘It’s better to go on a vacation than buy a new couch’ is basically the idea,” according to Professor Elizabeth Dunn (from the University of British Columbia), citing the research done by her colleagues, Leaf Van Boven and Thomas Gilovich. The theory is that vacations and other experiences offer longer-lasting memories than new stuff, which eventually becomes old stuff.
but I love it for a new home card,
"Hi everyone! Sassy Cheryl here and I’m so happy to be sponsoring the Aud Sentiments challenge this week. I have been creating graphics and have licensed my work to companies such as Kohl's, Hobby Lobby and Shopko, among others, for over six years. I started creating digital images about ten ago. I absolutely LOVE to draw and always carry a small sketchbook for those times when a bit of inspiration hits. It's been a lifelong dream to become a working artist, and besides deadlines, I LOVE everything about what I do! It really helps that I have a very supportive husband and son (they also can be my biggest critics!) Through the digis I create, I’ve met so many wonderful, talented ladies. The projects they make using my images makes it all worth it. ‘Can’t wait to see what you will create with my Sassy images. "
This story did indeed motivate me to donate. Thanks for inspiring me in just the right way today, Kate!
Tonight’s episode didn’t feature any random celebrity guest stars, but instead brought a sad end to one of the only storylines I’ve liked this season. Raj returned tonight for, I assume, his last appearance, and to say a tearful goodbye to Ivy.
Large format taxidermy is common in public spaces within Alaska – every mall has a bear or two. I grew up thinking this was just how it was, and when I finally visited the Lower 48 I wondered where all the dead animals were.
We did our usual getting together with the Bakers. The kids LOVE going trick or treating with Kaylee. Emily was following her around the entire night. Connor wanted to run to every house. The girls were holding him back. ;) This year Aria was able to join us as well.
Starting in May, I'm doing This Thing.
13. Self-regulation. Several models of optimal life-long development emphasize the importance of self-regulation as a key to a good life. This involves some of the issues already discussed (e.g. perseverance), but it brings to the fore the role of reasoned intelligence in guiding one’s decisions.
I have 18 more to go. I'm completely out of lace. Sheesh.
Racked: 08-17-2007
I ran and ran falling over bushes, thorns grabbing at my arms slicing my white flesh but still I ran, He was fast approaching I could hear him thundering through the forest He was approaching fast, the wind was howling like natives keening for their dead. Yelling the word, “filthy gypsy!”
In other(lovely) news I have received the Beautiful Blogger award from the brilliant Sarah over at Home Made Gorgeous. She has a wonderful blog and a pretty fab granny square background for her blog hehe! I love it!
I don't always have a specific target when I search, sometimes I just plug in a few words and "lot" and see what comes up. "Mets lot" is one of my five most common searches on eBay and last week I found a rather vaguely worded listing, offering 50 cards including "serial numbers" and "refractors" with nothing listed and only one card pictured. Normally, I would not take a chance on such a lot, but I was feeling frisky and the price was right. Lucky for me, the lot was all refractors and serial numbered cards. It is one of my favorite buys of recent memory. Lets take a look:
And, that won’t happen unless you have somebody out there making examples of people. So you go out, you look at an industry, you find people violating the law, you go aggressively after them. And we do have some pretty effective enforcement tools. Compliance can get very high, very, very quickly.
“They are gravity-fed,” he says. “There’s a path of least resistance to get to the next screen.” The player’s job is to find that path, he says. Games like this “infantilize children.”
Although based at Greenwich in Connecticut, USA, Bjorn Nielsen was born in Cape Town, South Africa, and grew up in Epsom, England, where he attended grammar school. He maintains strong ties with Britain and has stated he prefers the variety of racecourses in Britain compared to the USA. He, wife Debbie and their three daughters are long-standing American residents and he has been highly successful in the finance world, serving as managing director of Tudor Ventures, a private equity and venture capitalist firm. Nielsen has been a major investor at the horse sales for many years, using agents such as Jeremy Brummitt, Tom Goff and Charlie Gordon- Watson, and he was represented in the 1992 Derby by the Richard Hannon-trained Assessor, who finished ninth behind Dr Devious and went on to win the Group One Prix Royal-Oak and Group One Prix du Cadran in France. Other flagbearers include the Roger Charlton-trained Tante Rose, whom he bought for 350,000 guineas at Wafic Said’s dispersal in 2003 and won the following year’s Group One Sprint Cup at Haydock, and the 2011 Ladbrokes St Leger victor Masked Marvel, trained by John Gosden. Nielsen bought the Kingsdown training centre in Lambourn in 2009, with David Lanigan moving into the renovated stables in December, 2011. Most of his Flat string are now with Lanigan, although he still has horses with Charlton and Gosden. Long-term breeding prospect Dorcas Lane was bought for 475,000 guineas in November and is now in training with Lanigan. Nielsen has around a dozen broodmares at Lord & Lady Lloyd-Webber’s stud farms in Britain and Ireland.
Dies: Spellbinders Labels Twenty Two; Memory Box Madera Borner; Cheery Lynn Olive Branch
Where I went wrong?
Tanner leaned back in his seat and grinned just a split second before everything around him was engulfed in a ball of fire and his HMMWV was launched into the air.
Overall, however, efforts by Mali’s new civilian authorities and by the international community to get the government up and running again, without undue interference by the military, seemed to be working. Then, late Thursday, we learned that a summit of West African heads of state in Abidjan, organized by the Economic Community of West African States (ECOWAS), had decided to fix the duration of Mali’s transitional president and government at 12 months, and to dispatch at least 3000 soldiers to Mali to “secure the transitional government” and “supervise the transition.” And they threatened targeted sanctions against junta leaders who didn’t abide by ECOWAS decisions.
Christian View:
A couple of days later, the laughing Accountant called my cell phone while I was walking out the door. I saw the first name, thought it was someone else - a very hot, single fireman that I had seen a month prior, and answered it with a very exuberant "Well hello there handsome!" I could practically hear the panting on the other end of the phone. Fuck. Excuses started entering in head in lightning speed. Family party, work function, death in the family, drinks with an old friend, gotta wash my hair...and I couldn't do it. He asked if I wanted to go to a hockey game and I said yes.
After enjoying it for a day, I said, "You know you can't keep it because it has internet. How many times did we tell you that you can't have internet phone in this house?"
Signed -
Chicken 65 is a preparation in which flavored chicken pieces, usually boneless, are batter fried and topped with tempered seasonings. Critics may say that wings aren't used in this recipe. But that's the joy of cooking, adapting recipes to accommodate your tastes, your ideas and also what you have stored in your refrigerator or pantry, all without demolishing the overall structure and taste of the recipe.
“Because I…” He hesitated, trying to come up with something that would sound believable. “I have a column due in the morning and I haven’t even started on it yet.” She knew all about deadlines, so she would understand that. Besides, he did have a column to write, it just wasn’t due until next week. “Rain check?”
I’ve mentioned that I’m on the JV team of the challenge since I have not yet reached awesome endurance runner status. (Have no doubt that I’ll get there, but these things take time & work. I’m willing!)
Fondant Finish, Gumpaste Decorations
Are elliptical miles and running miles interchangeable?
You may remember it was while at the London School of Economics Saif was maliciously and scurrilously accused of plagiarism after submitting his thesis entitled “The Mathematical calculations of String theory and its algebraic equations with the Principles of Dark Matter and Multiple universes”. This magnificent piece of scientific research was submitted immediately after Saif had completed an accredited course of Period Furniture Restoration in Whitechapel.
Thanks, Darlene, for keeping us on task with this!
Not being fully aware of my pace doomed me early! At the 1 mile mark I was at 6:50! Folks, for me, this is TERRIBLE!!! Most runners aim to do what’s called negative splitting; which basically means you start off running slow and pick up speed as you go to prevent from burning yourself out early. This would have been great for someone with my goal who negative splits, unfortunately I do the opposite! I start off like a bat out of hell and endure the pain of trying to maintain it! My 1st mile of a good, long run is around 6 minutes even; so 1 mile into the race and I was already 50 sec off and without a system to track my overall pace!
Crazy, right?! Seeing my font in in Seventeen and Cosmo was cool enough.... but my favorite store ever? They are using it on their website too. And they have no idea how much I heart them.
Craig and I spent the rest of Saturday on the River Walk. We went to the MAX and saw a film about the Alamo. Then, we toured the Alamo. We walked around the River Walk, ate dinner at Casa Rio, and walked some more. It's such a beautiful place, and we really enjoyed it.
PRAGMATIC N HR SERVICES
In a year’s time I’ve lost at least 20 pounds and built up some muscle. In February of this year I began race training. As soon as I got the Nike+ device for my shoe, I began tracking my times and distances. I was then able to compare times. I used the information to see when I had the most energy and was doing my best running.
Eww Kelsey Grammar. Don't worry, he's not on screen yet.
While Sylvester McCoy does a lot of clowning, he gives us a much darker Doctor. He mysteriously knows about Goronwy, he shows menace in his confrontation of Gavrok and stands at a distance from the other characters by his comment about the 'irrationality of love.'
Linking with:
Pearl Zhang was born in Sichuan Province in China, and grew up during the Cultural Revolution. She was raised in a typically Chinese manner, went to school, got a job, got married, and her whole life path was mapped out, or so it seemed. Then she seized the opportunity to study in the United Kingdom – and stayed. How did she adjust to the Western way of life, and what did she have to do to overcome the barriers? Would she find happiness and fulfilment with her English suitor in Scotland, or would her heartache continue? She was in a new world, both foreign and exciting – under the Same Moon.
“It is a problem,” I agreed.
"Passion" is such a cliched term that I almost hate to use it, but it's true, isn't it? You can tell when a person has a passion. Pushing it in your face and reminding you all the time that they do this one thing -- that's not passion. I don't know what that is. Maybe insecurity.
As board members change and priorities refocus, a board should never forget to provide open communication avenues to the homeowners.
rare earth metals.
All that is the hard part, the bittersweet part. On the other hand…I get a front row seats into watching these wonderful souls bloom. I remember looking into each of their eyes when they were born and asking them, “who are you?”. I would watch them in their cribs and wonder what they would do and where they would go. Today my two youngest when to a conference. They attended this through the school’s GSA club that they started (much like their older sister did when she was their age). They attended leadership workshops and had a great adventure. In case you missed my FB posts, I’m proud. They are strong young women who stand up for what they believe in, even in the face of ridicule from peers. They are kind, compassionate and loving. They make their community a better place everyday. They make my life a better place and I am grateful.
I was just playing around with it tonight, in terms of quantities, so I didn't take any accurate measurements. I'll make this recipe again in a few weeks and actually measure things, so I can post a recipe for everyone to enjoy!
Mr. Browne then wrote that we have a choice between war and peace. If we choose war, we fuel the terrorists desire to attack us. No one (that is not bribed by us) supports us in war. If we will risk peace, it is very likely that the death and destruction will end immediately.
Ghost 2: Yeah man, a complete bag of douches. I did ectoplasm the hell out of his shirt though.
I - Indigenous people. We have many living in our area. At least 7 different tribes.
Birds - were you listening?
Soon enough, time becomes compressed for Hans Castorp, for his trip ends one stop earlier than he expects -- just as he thinks that the journey will be over soon, it is already over.
The Indian Ministry of Home Affairs estimates the following yearly deaths from the violence:
MXFQS Blog (mxfqsblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I have a feeling this is going to come back to haunt me next Christmas where my brothers will decide to lock me in a room with a non-stop stop-motion-athon that they have set up to play on the television from which I will be unable to escape….
Emily E. Auger, PhD
–Increase taxes on corporate jets. Total: $3 billion
Preheat oven to 325 degrees. Butter and flour a 13x9x2 inch baking pan very well. Sprinkle coconut and pecans into the pan. Prepare cake batter according to package directions. Pour batter into prepared pan. In a mixing bowl, beat together the cream cheese and butter until blended. Add egg and blend. Add powdered sugar, mixing one cup at a time. When all is combined, beat until smooth. Drop by tablespoons over the batter to within 1 inch of edges. Bake for 55-60 minutes or until a toothpick inserted near the center comes out clean. Cool for 10 minutes, then invert onto a serving platter.
On.
Just so you know, I’ve used every one of these crafting mediums with some regularity and skill. Much more when our children were home, which I really don’t understand since I had less time then.
of humans who secretly worship nothing.
Opening hours: Fridays, Saturdays, Sundays and French public holidays, from 15:00 to 20:00.
Our house now is different. It had only one prior owner, as all the neighbors made clear when we moved in. They each would tie us to the property by the only prior owners: “so you’re the ones who bought Dr. Hindman’s house.”
of the Cuban Women’s Federation (FMC).
The backgrounds, though, turn out best. Patricia Doktor, Brad Hicks, Ian Miller and Charles Pickens went out of their way to create nightmarish cityscapes, monolithic buildings, overly-twisted roadways, city blocks that look as if H.R. Giger were their architect and ingenious architectural designs which do their best to make it feel that the characters and incidental figures that are laid over top of them seem almost a sacrilege to what they are covering up.
Here's some sickening irony — looks like they are pouring blood onto the Indian soil. Which is pretty much what happened. 2259 immediately dead, 3787 eventually dead, with possibly 25,000 dying from disease related to the 42 tons of methyl isocyanate gas released due to complete and utter negligence — including shutting down a safety system that would have saved everybody, in order to save money. THE INVISIBLE HAND OF THE MARKET DOES NOT FIX THINGS LIKE THIS.
“You feel like heaven to touch / I wanna hold you so much / At long last love has arrived / And I thank God I’m alive” – how many writers have put these thoughts in a hero or heroine’s head? The jaded person who didn’t believe that love was for them, who is consumed with the desire to simply revel in the person with whom they have fallen – fallen hard and fast – in love? Let’s also not forget the following knee-weakening lines:
Every book is different. Some books pour out. Some books sputter along painfully. Some need a little revision and some need a lot.
I guess Torchwood and Galactica still have to be classified as light entertainment. But I have to say that what the public will tolerate in their TV dramas has certainly changed a lot of late. It's clear that nobody was expected to feel surprised at watching these venal, slimy British politicans paying with their children's lives for their own political futures.
The Well-Planned Day planner is a tool I use every single day, homeschooling or not. I’m so glad I found this resource and only wish I’d had it sooner!
Hold onto me please
My favorite scenes were the ones in which people were either making or watching films. In particular, the scene at the beginning in which a full orchestra is accompanying the premiere of Valentin’s latest spy film. It tickled just the spot in my brain that is in love with film. Perhaps this film will only appeal to those in love with the history of film. There is no question such a love would deepen your appreciation for the film. I think, though, there is just so much charm, class, an style in this film (not least of all from Jack the dog, who is undeniable cute and a crowd-pleaser), that I think it is capable of infecting anybody with its joy.
Don't let the subtitles throw you, it was the only video of the scene I could find.
“Aww, honey, are you OK?”
To illustrate community support for the resolution, I added:
Any requests please fire them into the comments box
This is my first post since switching to the new blogger thingy. I have to use Google Chrome, and I don't like it. I swear these Google/Blogger changes are aimed at eFing me up. Really!!! I'll carry on with the rest of this post as if this SNAFU isn't happening.
"Presidents are elected in the middle and they are elected by being bigger than their party. Neither parties' activists alone can elect somebody president," From said in a telephone interview from his Washington office. "Democrats have a long history of nominating people, including people who have lost badly. The challenge for Democrats is to nominate somebody who can win the election."
This sound was recorded on March 5, 1997 on the Equatorial Pacific Ocean autonomous hydrophone array.
One thing I know
Right now, the heart is slowly mending,
Peg’s two friends came along and all three of them work together for the postal service in NJ. So we thought it would be fitting to take a photo of them in front of the huge post office on Canal Street.
Metallica One US
Here is my newest gal, a little bit of pencils with copics. I like the effect of using both.
I’ve been looking forward to doing this post for the last month. I’m excited to see where I stand in the face of my goals. Plus it’s a great reminder of the goals I set out to achieve.
Returning to Manohara. She is now playing in a famous TV series, about a young woman who is abused by her husband. She is also giving “expensive” lectures, and the documentary about her adoption is running continuously on Indonesian Television. The Prince is not giving any interviews.
It's not as if people reading the book won't have come across the word. Nigger, before. They just won't get a chance to see it used in context, from a certain time period, and associate it with how people thought then, how people think now, the weight of words and terms etc. There will be no chance to grow for people reading this shame-marked book.
government made the necessary
We have been trying to incorporate more and more chicken stock into our diet, but it can be hard to keep up our supply. I came across a post by Jenny over at Nourished Kitchen in which she talked about her method for perpetual bone broth. She actually cooks the same set of bones for a week in her slow cooker removing broth each day and adding more water. She is able to get a half gallon of broth from one set of bones from a roasted chicken. That was amazing to me! We only have a small slow cooker and it seems to cook pretty hot even on the low setting, so I didn't think we could get a week out of it, but decided to try a couple of days.
Sin, if a woman looks less beautiful than it could be.
I could put all these Asshole Things on the Asshole Chair of Shame, also known as The Chair of Things to Donate to Goodwill. Otherwise known as the Asshole Chair That Fills Up Every Weekend.
According to George Barna – statistician-guru and pollster for all things religious in the United States – that’s our biggest problem today. Instead of the church influencing our culture, the culture is influencing the church. We don’t look much different from the world. Listen to what Barna says:
9. Everyday People—Sly and The Family Stone
Here’s a bunch of people, that lead their own routines too – as students, or white collared workers. I like that they’re giving people a reason to smile, and it doesn’t matter who those people are. They’re not out for fame, they’re not being paid by a company… they’re just doing it for fun and goodwill.
My inner monologue goes something like this: They are in my class, well-aware that they, or their parents, are paying to be there; they are experiencing first-hand contact with a noted author, and making a choice to do what they do. If it is impossible for students to stay off their phones for an hour and fifteen minutes, or to sit in the seat without getting up, eating, drinking Starbucks, going to the bathroom, dropping their highlighters and hand-held devices, and other random gestures, then what is to be gained by my trying to stop them coercively, as opposed to permitting them to behave in customary ways?
The Venture Bros. is like a quote machine.
I’m not exactly sure when the exact moment came or moments or days when we began to see things differently— maybe it was the day I saw a little girl run into her father’s arms on his way home from work or a father showing his young son Shea Stadium for the first time from the window of the #7 Train- shining like a great ancient jewel under the Flushing sun— something let us feel what it would be like to be parents no matter what the child looked like or talked like.
they are too much =/
The stars dazzle-dance
I simply glued all of it down using "Crafters Pick Fabric Glue" and I am thrilled with how it came out! It's perfect for when I am shopping the fields in Warrenton!
Some of the cruisers that we met are continuing on, and some, like us, have decided not to. To those who are continuing on we wish you safe sailing and many more fascinating experiences. The countries we visited and the local people that we met were always so inspiring. Where ever we went, we were greeted with big smiles and a request to have a picture taken with us. The people were so gracious and generous, and we always felt welcome. To those who are now landlubbers like us, we wish you the best.
We're all done calving for the year...our two cows have done us proud! Paddy, a lil' heifer out of Ellie Mae, was born last Friday, then Tuesday afternoon Annabelle delivered a heifer which My Man named Tumbleweed.
May 1st: There are still several kids who need sponsored so that they can go to camp this summer! Can you please consider donating towards that or at least pray for generous hearts to give to these kids? I’m not sure what the current number is, but there are still well over 50 kids who need sponsored, last I knew. Perhaps closer to 100. Can you please help?
up to under the ribbed vault
Feast or famine, baby! It seems as if I go days without anything happening and then boom! I'm swamped. Yesterday was such a day. I had a bunch of events yesterday that piled up on each other. I was completely exhausted by the end of the night.
We are breeding virtual workers without realizing it. The workplace is still in transition from the traditional to virtual environment and Generation Y is living through this uncomfortable change. The following generation will have it a bit easier. The workplace will already be mobile, flexible, virtual and global by the time they enter it. Leaders today, regardless of what generation they are from, should try to get ahead of the curve, or at least embrace the coming changes. Evolution is inevitable, but as quality guru Edwards Deming used to say, survival is not mandatory. In the meantime, Gen Y, you can start prepping your snarky comments for Generation Z. You’ll eventually get to pick on the new guys.
“Yes. Suction magic,” replied Swain.
We pondered the tippytoey nonsense of heels of 8” and the folly of safe places which often have to be drummed up at speed and regretted later.
I haven’t taken any photos of Bradley, Leah and Charlie for a few days and Leah wanted me to take some photos of her to put in the front of her new secret diary, so I took more shots of her and the other two for today’s blog. I also just randomly took some photos of the stuff that was lying around that they’d been playing with. The table was a mess from Leah’s crafting, so there was plenty of things there and the boys were busy playing with the mini stunt-bike and skateboard.
will I make a lasting print,
Apr 5
He would recruit the girls to join his model agency on Facebook before luring them with promises of money to entice them into the vice trade. As a ‘requirement’ to work as a prostitute, they must first pass an ‘entry test’ of pleasing him in bed satisfactorily before they can be ‘inducted’ officially into his ‘stable’. He would then take a cut from their earnings as his ‘commission’.
There are a number of significant differences between Vulgar Latin and Classical Latin: unstressed vowels are omitted in Vulgar Latin, causing words like masculus to become masclus; vowels like o and e become u and i (coluber becomes colober, dimidius becomes demedius); and the h is omitted, both initially (hostiae becomes ostiae) and within the word (adhuc become aduc). The latter can still be found in French pronunciation; the h is nearly always silent.
Metallica Enter Sandman US
and pressed "start".
Can't I watch just one more episode of their favorite TV show?
And if you order now, we’ll throw in good feelings and world peace. Operators are standing by to take your order.
Bah. I will head in, and if I get sent home, then I will know!
For my circles I chose some great paper from the Tim Holtz Retro Grunge stack. I distressed my photos and all paper elements with my distressing tool and then inked with distress ink. I added my twine and stacked two buttons. Hope you (and everyone from Pumpkin Spice) enjoy viewing it!
Made soft
Hugs Bonnie
A photograph of that moment shows Foster in the cockpit and Goering seated directly behind him, his elbow jauntily propped on the plane’s fuselage.
He picked up his pace; no time to loiter. He felt a little silly for having come so close to tears. There was no use crying over ancient history. Tearing up over the land that had once been America made no more sense than weeping about the destruction of the library of Alexandria. That last thought brought him fully back to reality, and he moved on with more purpose. His ticket was good for only one day, and as he had just remembered, he’d wanted to see the exhibit on ancient Egypt.
As the bus continued on towards downtown, more passengers boarded with gloomy expressions over the unexpected rain. However, through the gray faces, Jack and James seemed to melt into their own world, sharing their life stories with one another.
Providing land to others is like a potential suicide for farmers, not just for small scale farmers. The trend which is more worry-some is about different countries buying land to do farming. China and Saudi Arabia have already purchased so much land in Africa. The target being India, gives jitters to me. Will we be living the horrors of our past. ? Already the article of land purchasing by govt which dates back to 1894 is causing so much headlines.
So we all know I've gone back to work...
I’m going to go now. Take from that what you will.
Researchers at Edinburgh University are working with a team from Harvard Medical School in Boston to be the first in the world to produce mature human eggs from stem cells isolated from human ovarian tissue.
I didn't delete the comment because I was hoping that you will go to the post and read the comment - it's the second Anonymous - and in the future when you write a comment on a post on this or any website think about your words before you type and click ok/send. Remember that there is a person on the other end of that post/comment you are commenting on and think about what you would say to that person's face if you had the chance. Would you be rude and mean? Would you say what you're writing? Would you wear a mask to hide who you are and say mean things? And how would you like it if those things were said to you?
my bestest friend missy has the sweetest baby girls. well, marlie's not really a baby anymore, she turns two tomorrow! in march i captured these photos of aborable miss marlie. isn't she sweet?
I've been playing around with some of the images I liked from the trip, so I thought I'd share those. (As always, click on the images to see them bigger.)
But it woke me up. And here I am two hours later.
The Garbage Barge Revisited: Art from Dross June 13 – September 1
They’re too scared to achieve their dreams.
I had the pleasure of shooting with model, Jade Vixen. She is such a pleasure to work with and as interesting to talk to as she is to look at. She is a Penn State grad with a degree in computer science. She also shoots much of her own photos in her studio and does most all the post processing herself. Needless to say we spent a good bit of time talking shop and photo editing.
It should be an impossible task for a person involved in Icelandic literature as as a writer, critic and editor to decide on a favorite book - choose one of thousands. But I am not in doubt. My favourite book, since I first read it at the age of 23 , has been Salka Valka by Halldór Laxness. It was first published in two volumes in 1931 and 1932 and has been reprinted many times.
You're obsessed with clocks. Oh good lord. You can spot one on a billboard, in the car, in a grocery store on a tv show, anywhere. It's your favorite word in the world to say. (I'm glad I'm not the only one in the family that is obsessed with them.) You also are in love with rocks, which makes my heart happy. You don't hesitate to run outside, barefooted, onto the gravel driveway to pick out just the right little stones. When you bring them to me, as if they were diamonds, with sparkles in your eyes, it's the world 10 times brighter in my heart. Can I tell you something? I've kept every single one you've given me. I have them all in a little jar. Yeah, I know it will overflow one day but, they are my treasures from your first adventures in life. Building towers in your specific way is a hoot to watch. You wear your thoughts on your face. Your daddy and I have all the entertainment we need just watching you figure things out, processing your thoughts or trying to tell us something.
The rest of March was sheer madness as I found myself in a gnarly grant cycle with my NGO. Four due in six weeks and not a large team to do them. All four were submitted after hours and hours of work with positive feedback from our donors as we hit our deadlines and improved on our grant writing capabilities. Yay. I had a few weekend excursions to Chiang Mai and Chiang Rai but mostly the month was work, work, work. I decided that 2012 would be the year I would actually start freelancing instead of just talking about it. I had an article published in Latitudes: Your Gateway to Southeast Asia! And I decided to resign at my NGO. I’ve been here 15 months now and it’s become quite clear that it’s time to move on. It’s been an incredible experience no doubt and one I am grateful for. But this tadpole is ready for a new pond.
The entire cast really plays well off each other, and it’s fun to see them go back and forth with Whedon’s sharp dialogue. Robert Downey, Jr. gets the best lines and turns in a scene stealing performance once again. The big three (Captain America, Thor, and Iron Man) interact marvelously. Scarlett Johansson gets much more time to shine as Black Widow than she did in Iron Man 2. Here she is cunning, strong, and mysterious. She is given a backstory that is pure bad ass. Seeing Black Widow in a solo adventure now sounds like an exciting possibility. The same can be said for Cobie Smulders as Maria Hill. This easily could have been a forgettable character, but Smulders turns in a memorable performance as Fury’s right hand and takes to the action well. Samuel L. Jackson as Nick Fury is cool as hell and holds the glue for the narrative, and once again Clark Gregg as Agent Coulson is great and truly the heart of the film. The only actor who kind of gets shortchanged is Jeremy Renner as Hawkeye. He doesn’t get much time during the film to breathe like the other cast members, but he makes up for it with some exciting action during the finale.
It is a tradition here to leave a lighted slow burning candle in a globe on the graves of loved ones. These would normally last for a week and they are then replaced with a new one. More recently you can also buy these battery operated for longer life, depending on the batteries!.
38. It’s a good thing I brought my gloves today, other wise you’d be too hot to handle! -
World Alliance for Breastfeeding Action. Mother Friendly Workplace Initiative (Action Folder). WABA 1999, Penang, Malaysia: 1-9.
In a ruling announced yesterday, Manhattan Supreme Court Justice John Stackhouse granted the one-week stay pending a Monday hearing, when lawyers for the Union Square Community Coalition will ask to have work halted until litigation is complete.
Yep, missing the run sucked. But I had to just go with it rather than risk bigger injury, and in the end it was pretty cool to have spectated the race. Sometimes things don't work out how you want, but it's not always a bad thing.
I detest the gaudy display of wealth in these places of worship where we see the names of people who have given “DAAN(offerings)” . It looks so crude. Is this some “name to fame” kind of show? Something to brag about for generations to come. Birla Mandir is one such example. Poor God has been left sitting quietly on his pedestal. It is not something new, it began from the times of kings.
Evin O'Riordan, Brewer/Owner of Kernel Brewery has one of the most recognisable brands in London now with the plain brown labels merely stating what style of beer is in the bottle and which hops were used in that batch.
1745 N. Vermont Ave
Then I explained a little more what Serive Design is and showed that the same skills that are important for Physical Interaction Design are also important for Service Design:
Perkins
Now those memories seem
Posted on May 3, 2004, Source: TomDispatch.com
I was a bit apprehensive about this recipe as I was taking a risk doing them like this, and didn't have the opportunity to make any more should they go wrong!! But luckily, the gamble paid off! The cake is great and a provides a much better, denser base for all that yummy buttercream.
The kit will be in a sealed box alongside more traditional mini-bar items like nuts, chocolate and alcohol. Guests can request an extra special kit containing a whip, mask and bondage tape.
i am dancing: of course this world's a stage.
Well, lately there has been a huge blowup about a woman (whose name I can’t remember at the moment because I don’t care enough about her to bother) who kind of looks like Angelina Jolie if she had 14 kids.
The bread was indeed lovely to behold and very tasty too. I made two loaves (using the halved recipe measurements). One loaf with nutella, peanut butter and grated dark chocolate, the other loaf with the nut filling in the challenge recipe except I used a mix of brazil nuts, almonds and cashews as I couldn’t find any walnuts in the pantry. As mentioned, I thought it was very tasty, especially the nutty version, but my fussy spoilt family members weren’t all that taken with it. (insert huge eye roll here).
Maybe I'm less interesting than I thought.
Without the immortal nectar of Hari-kathā our short lives are wasted on nothing of importance; we become stunted in every way.
To learn more about Hosho McCreesh and see what other poetry and stories he has published, visit his web-site at:
made from salvaged wood and marble. La Cuevita also features two
More than words - Ok, I could be blatantly breaking the 200 followers here. If Jodie Ansted’s new blog hasn’t attracted 200 already, as the writer behind Mummy Mayhem, it won’t take long.
I returned and horrors!! Matilda, my pet cat has spoiled my day.. Horrors.. The whole bottle was down and it was on the A4 sheet. My poem written in ink was lost in its creator. The bunch of A4, drank it all, the rich blend. My rich old wine.
5. Bake the lasagna for 40 minutes. Continue baking uncovered until the sauce bubbles and the top is golden, 15 minutes longer. Let the lasagna stand for 15 minutes before serving.
Round the end of the lake, past some sluices where we saw these elegant dogs chilling out. Back up through woodland and out on to the road to the car. We followed this by a trip to the tearooms in Lorton where my husband indulged in ginger cake and cream.
In an effort to keep my kids up to scale on their reading and just trying to keep them busy in general this summer, I decided to initiate a summer reading program. First, I enrolled Nicholas and Nathan in our local library summer reading program. This is such a great concept for kids. They really get the kids involved in reading. In the program, they have to follow certain guidelines like, read so many books and do activities, etc. They give out cool prizes, have pool parties and zoo trips. The teens are even going river rafting this year.
A military mission from Morestra has also arrived to investigate. The culprit is revealed to be a creature from a universe of antimatter, retaliating for the removal by Sorenson of some antimatter samples from around the pit that acts as an interface between the two universes.
3. Sort out all Year 3 copybooks and handouts so you will be able to do revision during the summer. Refer to the handouts file I have given you today.
Okay, that got way too much into the ‘Choose Your Own Adventure’ format. -nervous cough- Moving on.
** Blog about this giveaway and link back to this post ( counts as 5 extra entries) leave 5 separate comments saying "I blogged about this giveaway#1" and so on. Be sure to leave me the link to the post, so I can check it out.
-Add the ginger garlic paste and curry leaves.
The rules require that members let e-mail recipients know how they can refuse future mailings and allow consumers to prevent the sale or rental of their addresses
or wind-swept tears
I had it planned so that I'd have an hour to pick up the dog and get her fed and settled, and then plenty of time to change and get to my destination. This lab stuff is just like that. The samples had to be processed then, or we'd lose them. It all turned out fine, and I enjoyed the wine and catching up with friend D.
"Come with me if you wanna live," he said.
Here's a photo labeled Louise Althaus, Roseburg Oregon. Every time I look at this picture and the cinched in waist, I feel like I need to take a deep breath.
As this happened in a private hospital, we (my accompanying friend and I) were given tea and two Quality Street chocolates afterwards by the very amiable Irish nurse who told me that, if you give blood in Edgware, they give you cup of tea, a sandwich of your choice and crisps. As I have shamefully not given blood for about three years, this is tempting.
“Wow, you look different this morning.” The voice of the secretary interrupted Sierra’s thoughts.
I haven't bought from them before but I'm sure the quality would be just as good as the style. My 2 favorite outfits are pictured above, Check out their website and let me know what your favorite item is taqwaiman.com
After finishing my meal I head back to the counter where Eduardo is rightfully giving me a suspicious look after watching me take snaps of his home-made food. Luckily, after I told him that I loved it I was forgiven and introduced to Luiz Fernando Bonadio, the cafe’s 32-year-old owner from Brazil.
On the surface, a discussion of the historical significance of national health care seems innocuous. When something that has never happened before happens, it can certainly be described as "historic." However, when a Marxist mentions anything regarding history, it has a different connotation altogether.
2/3 cup self rising flour
A few weeks ago, I sat down and read The Hunger Games trilogy, and I was excited to see how well it would translate to the big screen. I got my chance to find out today as I went to the 9:30 showing of the first book, The Hunger Games. The dystopian science fiction action-drama film – which is rated PG-13 for intense violent thematic material and disturbing images – stars Jennifer Lawrence, Josh Hutcherson, Liam Hemsworth, Woody Harrelson, Lenny Kravitz, Elizabeth Banks, Stanley Tucci, and Donald Sutherland. Book to film translations are always a mixed bag; for every Harry Potter, you get a Percy Jackson (I’m only assuming, because I’ve never read any of the Percy Jackson books). This film has the benefit of having the author of the series serve as one of the writers of the film. Does the impact and import of Suzanne Collins overrule whatever Lionsgate Films would want to do with her property, or does she stand firm? Only one way to find out…
It was so sunny and the reflection off the water blinded me. So I just pointed the camera where I thought the bloom was and clicked.
(phew, thought they’d never leave)
To get a sense of the horrors of “sexual terrorism,” we thus need to leave the hallways of academia and go to the cubicles of American bureaucracy. A change of venue that shows that Academia is irrelevant when it comes to solving pressing African problems today.
If I sound kind of defensive its because the usual happened "I killed them" they said in half-joking terms. "Were these boss monsters?" they asked stunned. The ghouls were randomly encountered. I rolled their targets randomly. I don't think ghouls would be considered impossible for 5 fighting types in plate and shield, 2 war dogs, and 2 magic-users. Especially when you encounter them 50 feet away and have time to prepare. Some of the party got into a shield wall, but on an outcropping, with backs to a wall that these creatures were climbing, it didn't do much good. The creatures flanked them and hit the mages behind the wall.
The vocals are little rough on the first track here, but be patient. Things pick up in a hurry.
No. 3 Indiana Pacers vs. No. 6 Orlando Magic
The blabbering mother of Cambria
We rode the Toys R Us Ferris Wheel for Kellen, which he couldn't have cared less about...then ate at Carmines which did not disappoint. I dream of that chicken Marsala.
Felicia
Pointed at him.
Coupled with the (teethless) biting, nipple pulling and lack of sleep makes me start to question the wonders of breast feeding.
So, enjoy the outdoors this spring and summer, but if someone (like my son’s classmate) says there is a small bug on you, don’t take it for granted. Let’s be safe out there!
Oh my, where was I? I do leave this Tale of Love from time to time,
Liver disease is increasing because people are switching from beer to stronger drinks. We already know this though, because this has been true of every major alcoholism epidemic in history. In the gin epidemic of the eighteenth century, beer was part of the solution, not the problem, as the immortal cartoons by Hogarth show. It should be seen as that today.
come with Thy grace and heavenly aid
Today I feel better again, so I got up with the greatest of intentions. Well, we all know what the road to Hell is paved with, right?
We Love Life is a precious Fashion Event to benefit Relay for Life.
Grated coconut - 2 to 3 tbsp
Well, I hope you liked my card and thank YOU for visiting my blog today! If you like the stamps I used today and want to buy them for your own collection be sure to visit the YNS store. There are lots of adorable stamps to choose from! Have a great weekend!
I am on cloud nine right now. My husband and I took off work all day today so we could spend some quality time with our girl. We cuddled, we colored, and then we cuddled some more. There was absolutely nothing else I would have rather done with my day.
First, my kitchen light. This is what I started with:
It was surprisingly easy to avoid Terri Jo those last few days of camp. She simply went from being the object of torment to being completely ignored by my cohorts and me. She was totally ostracized. One night during the free hours between supper and our scheduled evening activity, I saw her wandering in the big field that made up the outer reaches of the campus. The sun was setting, and in the brilliant orange light, I could make out that she was talking to herself while she picked wildflowers and poked anthills with a stick. She was utterly alone, and it was more or less my fault. It’s an image that still haunts me to this day.
He's been trimmed with vintage crepe paper that's been sewn and hand cut (by me) to mimic leaves around his base.
In keeping with my theme, I'm going to write a little about the llama. The spelling of the name has always fascinated me. How many other words start with a double letter? That might be an interesting Internet search sometime.
b) USA
A small number of central banks have started investing part of their reserves in equities. About 9 percent of the foreign- exchange reserves of Switzerland’s central bank were invested in shares at the end of the third quarter, the Swiss bank said on its website.’
streaming?
Oh wait....... she IS a small child. Scooter, our oldest granddaughter, received a .22 rifle for her birthday from her daddy and she loves to shoot it! She's 6 years old and I'm so glad that she will grow up knowing how to shoot.
Hey, I’m part Turkey!
The general blinked while his eyes adjusted to the bright light. Just beyond the edge of the illuminated landing strip, Wei was sure he saw muzzle flashes. A split second after he saw the flashes of light, Wei heard the sound.
With little gain and much to loose in this pipeline construction, people in British Columbia opposed to the pipelines see no real economic gain to the province.
A subtle tryst…seductively nutty, meaty, sponge-like fungi coupled with naughtily rich, creamy and velvety offal. Not much could be finer on earth. Spring rapture.
I have spent so much time recently mentally regurgitating much of my life – What has brought me to this point? Where am I going to go from here? What am I going to hang on to and what gets dropped into the metaphoric dumpster?
14. Secret Lover
Once this was dry it was evident just how different the wood dye tone was on the old top compared to the new top despite using the same tin of dye on both:
The United States ranks 11th in the percentage of taxes derived from individual income tax — mostly European nations tax at higher rates. Australia, Canada and New Zealand are certainly no tax havens.
Follow Me! (1 entry)
He spoke and wrote in Sanskrit, and would speak Kannada only if it was absolutely necessary.
There are many post card pictures of the Merlion on the Internet, side view and front view. I just thought why not show a different perspective from the back view instead. Here it is.
Now dont look too close as its a bit wonky....lol.its 4 sided and has 24 drawers and thank heaven for peeloff numbers is all i can say!
11. Turn your oven down to 160 ºC, gas mark 3. Spread the onion mixture over the flan, cut up the spinach and add it too.
1 tablespoon dark soy sauce
Here are 10 Things I am Thinking About After the First Week to Becoming a Runner:
"Impossible? Even if I buy one? Outright?"
I'll be going back through the quilt again with other colors for the leaves, etc.
It remains to be seen whether an ANC that has lost its political moorings and its firm foundations of non-racism - and instead has become a battleground for factional and material interests - can reposition itself at the vanguard of the struggle for a non-racial society.
as an unsolvable mass of matter.
Without getting into specifics, the song was horrible but since it wasn't posted on Youtube (until I posted it) and since we all have different taste, I posted it in case someone may be interested in it and would like to purchase it. It was from a compilation CD and was overall one of the worse songs on it. That's not to say it's a "bad song". Hell, I don't like Michael Jackson's music; it all sounds alike to me. Him going "belly up" didn't change my taste. I still own no Whitney Houston music either. Death doesn't impress me.
have lit up this face too many times to number.
A few weeks ago Sarah Burningham from Little Bird Publicity emailed me out of the wild blue yonder of the internet about a new project she and co-creator Chrissy Festa were putting together. QNSalon focuses on bringing together the strong/smart/independent ladies of Queens to network, share ideas, and talk about the business of being a lady in this fine borough of ours. Which is nice, go lady business(es)!
Did I mention shes NOT happy?
The Reapers largely symbolize cosmic indifference. The universe doesn’t care what I had for breakfast this morning, how nice I am to my neighbor, or how many people I might have murdered on the way to work. Neither do the Reapers. They will show the human race no empathy because, to them, our existence is equally as inconsequential as a collection of bacteria in a discarded piece of chewing gum. We are that bacteria. Worse: we are a virus.
*Amy Krouse Rosenthal
I suppose I am writing the lament of the single mom, or the “do-it-all” mom, the mom who doesn’t get much help or support from her partner in bringing up baby.
Just to hear your voice
I just wish--my one, true holiday wish, Santa--is for these radio people to understand that there's more Christmas music than the same ten songs that they play over and over and over and over again. Dean Martin is great, when he's not drunk and/or trying to slip a little something something into baby's drink, or ass, or both. Frank Sinatra has more than just one song. And while I do enjoy the smooth jazz stylings of the Merry Christmas Charlie Brown soundtrack, it gets old. Fast. Especially when it's on repeat.
Here's the first card with details~
PITESTISEMERAS 12
But the editor was not allowed to buy my book. Six months of waiting and hoping and working...gone with one email. I can't lie, it was devastating. How could it not be? When you work that hard for something, losing it is like this hole. I hadn't even realized just how much I'd expected it to happen until it didn't. My mental state since then has been shaky, as is my confidence.
I had quite the struggle to get this commentary done: it took a lot of honeyed discussions to convince Karen Black to sit down for one of her not-so-beloved movies, then there was the matter of nailing down a date to record it, and finally the finished commentary was literally added to the mastering process at the last minute! Thankfully it all came together. I think I'm alone in the wilderness in my genuine enjoyment of this long misunderstood film, which is really less of a horror film about devil cults and more a MEMENTO-style mediation on religion and righteousness. I only rank it lower than other commentaries I've done because upon listening to it, I have so many "Um" and "Ah" moments that the Toastmasters would grill me alive; I'm sure that's present on other commentaries I've done, but it just felt especially egregious here. Well, that and I occasionally lose my focus when Ms. Black chooses to take the discussion in another more interesting direction. Ultimately though, a long poortly-treated movie finally gets its due, and I got to help.
"Look into my eyes," she said. "It's me. You know you can trust me."
I don't know what is up right now, but I've been dreaming about you a lot lately. I don't know if it is the holidays or what it is, but you are obviously on my mind. I wish I could say the dreams make me happy, but they don't. Let me explain. About a week ago I had a dream that you were here and one of our family members was holding you. But then when I wanted to hold you, you were gone. So I spent a lot of time after that (in my dream) looking for you but couldn't find you. Then last night I had a dream that you were here too. And I was able to hold you and kiss you and show you off to people. Here's the catch though, you were still dead. I was pushing a dead baby around in a stroller. I was showing you off to everyone, all of our friends and family. I got to a point in my dream where I asked my friend, Beth if she would help me on the next day to bring you to the funeral home because I didn't think I could do it alone.
The Jumo 004 engine used in the Me-262 was the first production turbojet engine in operational use, but due to war-time limitations, lower grade metal was used and as such they had a very short service life (25 hours maximum). The engine was also used in the Arado Ar-234 “Blitz” (“Lightning”) the worlds first operational jet engined bomber/reconnaissance aircraft.
*** BOYS WILL BE BOYS***"
I'm finally getting my nose above water. I've been staying up past midnight every night doing work for the job, and although I've been drinking some great beerrs, I've not had the chance or energy to do anything more than twitter. @beerbrotha
like editing pictures a little crazily. just a little. c'mon, I know you do it too.
I figured if I spent an average of $100 a day (including rent, gas, movies, everything) and multiplied it by 365 days of the year, I'd have to save $36,500 to quit working for a year:
Walking into a custard shop and asking where the ice cream is isn’t a huge offense. Homer Simpson would do it. Joe Biden did that when visiting a Kopp’s Frozen Custard store in Wisconsin on Friday.
However, it would be harsh to condemn him for not resigning from what I assume was a highly paid job. Many people put up with a lot to keep themselves employed. It would be nice to be in a financial position where an employee could make such a decision with no thought for the lost income, but few of us are lucky so to be.
how great would it be to sew vintage sheets into beautiful cushion covers on this machine...
But part of being a blogger mom, is checking your email at midnight after your son has woke you up six times. As I laid there reading all the sweet comments about the canister idea, I had a brain storm - a news flash - and then my mind wouldn't rest until I did some research...
Less than five minutes later I emerged from the bushes. And the second I stuck my head out I wished I hadn’t. The scene before me was like something out of a sickly twisted horror movie. It was pitch black, despite the fact that it had been daytime just moments before. The only light was from, wait for it, Sophie’s eyes, and let me tell you those flashing rubies were less inviting than the darkness. I tried to manifest some sunshine or light of any kind, something to help me break through the darkness, but it was no use. This was Sophie’s domain and whatever powers I had were useless.
Juan Cole defends the use of force to aid the Libyan rebel movement. Professor Prashad warns the US has involved itself in a decades-long internal Libyan struggle.
change the dune's shape that will not be the same shape
Now the challenge this week is all about things that make you laugh, so we would love you to create a project that is side splitting funny! So get out all those funny character stamps or digi stamps, or alternatively make either a joke or funny saying the focus of your card. Alternatively share a funny memory with us via a mini album or scrap book page . . . lots of choices thee then!
MH: Well, I certainly hope we get to see more of Kimble. This brings up an interesting point that Steph Swainson recently came out about her belief that publishers require a book a year and the stress that put authors under. Yet you've been known to go as long as 4 years between releases. Do you think publisher's drive author's to do a book a year. Do you agree with her at all that if can effect the quality?
True, at his heart he was a clown. A few years ago when the Academy of Motion Pictures Arts and Sciences finally saw fit to bestow an honorary Oscar upon Edwards, he used his acceptance speech as an occasion for a gag, abetted by presenter Jim Carrey, showing up in a wheelchair with a broken leg and making it appear as if it went out of control and crashed through the wall of part of the awards show set. Like many recent honorary Oscar presentations, it was a highlight until the youth hungry, ratings-obsessed execs in charge segregated honorary awards to a nontelevised dinner where movie buffs couldn't celebrate significant players in film history such as Edwards anymore.
That didn’t really leave any extra cash to buy a dining room table. We looked on Craigslist for something cheap but ultimately decided not to bother. (1) The townhouse’s dining room was tiny. Only a really small table for two was going to fit there. (2) We were trying to buy a house. Who knew if the table we got would even remotely match the house we’d end up buying. (3) I was not excited to move ANYTHING else. Whether that meant into the townhouse, out of the townhouse, or into a new house. Moving stuff sucks.
I've used it on my blog, website and with
And…above all, loved someone no matter what people thought.
Sister Steinagel and I were pleased to welcome your son, Elder Kevin Carlisle, to the best mission in the world, the Ukraine Kyiv Mission. He is well and happy and we are impressed with his enthusiasm and preparation. After he arrived, we took the new missionaries for a visit to the mission office and the adjoining Temple and surroundings. Elder Carlisle and I also interviewed together after enjoying a meal together.
“I was so blind to believe you! You lied to me!” She reiterated in anger; tears forming in her eyes. “You’re nothing more than killing machines like me!”
It was built by men and women like our seven star voyagers, who answered a call beyond duty, who gave more than was expected or required, and who gave it with little thought of worldly reward.
Finally, the mother asked the daughter to sip the coffee. The daughter
Back to the charge he was actually found guilty of. It’s no secret that politicians except bribes in order to get political power, or votes, or basically for ulterior motives. A refreshing example of someone not changing their stance for political motives was shown by Barack Obama a few weeks ago, read my blog “The Oil-Pipeline Fiasco” to get the full story.
that hasn't been given? days
The minute I hit the back road, I was stuck behind really enthusiastic bike riders, who seemed to be determined to make me late. There is a bicycle trail right beside the road, but I guess that one is just for ladies/ kids or for those wimps who value life and are too chicken to ride on the winding road. We aren’t like that, are we? We like to take risks and rush at 15mph blocking the traffic that could otherwise have gone at 45-50mph. Who cares if those boring motorists are in an urgency right! I mean, come-on if they really had to go to an ER/ bathroom/ hair-cut, they should’ve taken the highway right?
I always enjoy walking near water and I really love being near the sea, I definitely miss living next to the (river) Tay. I’m pretty sure that staying in such a lovely setting next to the water was one of the main things that kept me going when I was struggling at university. It’s nice revisiting the sense of wellbeing that the salt air brings.
Anyway, on a whim we decided that we would join the masses and head to Boston's Esplanade for the fireworks display. We figured out how to take the T there and when we arrived, the place was already packed. Somehow, we found a spot on a bridge, and sat there for hours with our feet dangling over the Charles River. A very annoying vendor was perched close by our spot, and we endlessly listened to him hawk, "Glow sticks! Get your glow sticks he-ah!" We commiserated with our neighbors about it, but didn't give up our prime location. Suddenly, and I'm still not sure how it happened, one of Julie's new Naot sandals, fresh from Israel itself, dropped into the river! There was a bit of pandemonium, and a small crowd assembled as Julie was forced to wade into the river and retrieve her shoe. We all looked around for the glow stick guy, who had mysteriously disappeared, just when we could have used one of those damn glow sticks to help reach the lost shoe. Julie got fairly wet, and despite hours of sitting in the sun, still had a damp shoe as we shuffled back on the T to go home. We kept looking for signs of radiation sickness from her time in the river, but Julie managed to survive.
02. Look Here
A very interesting article goes deep with the Shelton Brothers, who import international beers for the U.S. market (in addition to brewing their own).
So most of you know that the smartest man in the world just so happens to be my father. I'm constantly amazed at his endless knowledge, most recently so during a casual conversation about how nasty my plastic garden tub at my aparment is (I'm going to save you the pictures... trust me, NASTY), especially after a few dog baths in it. I mentioned that I've tried EVERYTHING from regular Scrubbing Bubbles to bleach cleaners. All they did was make me frustrated.
Thank you Lilley!
My dad isn't supposed to be dead at 62; and yet he is.
after the movie, it turned out the B-rad really REALLY wasn't feeling well. So, i drove us home, the date night over.
There are all sorts of views expressed intelligently and carefully between these contributors, which between them do more to identify the problem rather than offer a solution to the problem of what the writings canonised by one or another faith or denomination have to do with a (postulated) divine communicator.
No bargainers’ bargains by day—no brokers or speculators—would they
The text from the 7th-10th verses of Chapter 14 of Surya Siddhanta becomes extremely relevant to establishing the tropical zodiac as correct in an Indian context. Here is some of that discussion:
½ cup of sweetened coconut
The gardening DVD covers making and using compost, raised bed, container and lasagna gardening as well as a nifty no-soil plan for growing potatoes. Did you know that basil LIKES to be planted by tomatoes? I didn't either, until the West ladies shared that little tid-bit of information with me. What are some natural ways to deter bugs from your garden produce? Watch this DVD and you will find out!
To prepare compote, combine cherries, 1/4 cup granulated sugar, 2 tablespoons water, and cornstarch in a medium saucepan; bring to a boil. Cook 1 minute, stirring constantly. Remove from heat; stir in extract. Cool. Serve with cake. From Cooking Light
Isn't she a cutie!!! I used the double dutch fold to make this card! Here is the ingredients I used to make this card! TFL!
It’s probably a bad sign, either for my ability to empathize, or a film’s success at requesting emotional connection, that I spent a fair amount of time hoping for characters to get shot, in the head if at all possible. Men, women and children alike. Thankfully, as often as not, I got my wish. It’s not that I wish harm to the Poles or for the defeat of the Warsaw Uprising by the Germans, it’s just that this film starts with such a tone of defeat that I took their word for it that defeat was inevitable and just got on board with wanting it to come sooner rather than later, much like my view of the apocalypse (come on Mayans).
The fact that the same four-star commander, always an American, invariably holds both posts simultaneously indicates the degree to which the Pentagon’s EUCOM, which took in almost all of Africa in its area of responsibility until spawning U.S. Africa Command and still includes Israel, and NATO are inseparably connected.
Sue has two children. Her son Michael is her oldest and he will graduate high school this year. Monica is her young daughter and will be promoted to second grade. Bruce is her fiancé and will soon be my son-in-law. I am a lucky man to have such a wonderful family.
Born down in a dead man's town
1/2 teaspoon baking powder
The first thing that Maisie said to me when I picked her up from school was that I forgot to put a jelly in her bento. Funny little jelly loving girl. Maisie ate all but one quiche.
To learn a little more about this company and enter to win a really great 5 in 1 puch by Envirosax click here
Moon sped up beside her.
I am so grim, too many fist fights
Yesterday I had photography at 8, which all we did was a critique and I don’t know how this teacher managed to drag out a critique of 10 people’s photos for an hour and a half. At 9:30 I went back to bed until 11 when I met Caitlin for lunch. Then at 11:30 I went to computer science lab, and my teacher kept asking me how I was feeling and stuff like that, he’s really nice. I’m sad I won’t be taking computer science any more after this year because he is a great person and I like him a lot. I’m just not sure how much long I can stand dismally failing.
Well here it is! I have officially made the switch! I can’t believe it took me almost 3 years to get on over this way! So far I am absolutely loving the user friendliness!
What then is faith?
We’re on a walk. Gussie starts howling before I even hear the siren. He’ll stop sniffing or pulling on the lead ( always has to be in the front of our pack) and then throw his head back and wooo-ooo, whooo. He thoroughly indulges himself in his primal howl response. The Empress on the other hand doesn’t stop her fox-like trotting. She stops and looks around her when the sirens (ambulance only) are next to us, then she’ll do a quick wooo-ooo, stop and look around like, who howled? “You did, little dog”, I tell her. Not me her foxy trot says, and don’t be mean calling me a dog . If she had a mane to toss over her shoulder, she did.
Let’s get at this difference closer by talking about the word ‘faithfulness’. Faithfulness is that quality in a person who possesses faith and acts in accordance with it. A person with faith ought to be faithful. Now, to say that faith is a feeling is to say that faithfulness, as a way of evaluating our faith, is a measure of how much you felt God throughout your life. But this is highly suspect. We know already that our feelings are fickle. They change from day to day and hour to hour. Furthermore, my feelings are one of the most unreliable guides to action in my life. If I depended on my feelings to make all my choices, I would make terrible choices. My feelings cannot support my marriage. My feelings will not make me a responsible and truly loving father. My feelings will make me a fickle pastor. Just in practical terms, nobody maintains a sense of inner fervency at all times; everybody has periods when they’re down and low. Faithfulness cannot be a measure of your feelings because nobody here has control over his or her feelings. And so we must, we absolutely must, separate our feelings from our faith. They are not the same thing.
“Good comics can insult you to your face.”
1. Punch Drunk Panda Merchandise: I have forever loved funky pop-art and this line is just so me! You have to check out their website: Click Here. So yes friends, anything Punch Drunk Panda will be awesome. But if you really want to make me happy please do get me any of these items:
President Obama -
“I have to go now, Nick. I’m meeting your sister for breakfast. Listen to me. You need to pull yourself together. In your line of work, bad things happen when you lose your concentration.”
It’s always shocking to me just how far out of their way some horror filmmakers will go to make their characters unlikeable guilt free fodder. Sure the vapid bros who populate say The Friday The 13th Nu Metal Remake don't "deserve" their grisly deaths by any real world measure. But by movie morality Jason is nothing less than the swift hand of justice. They may as well have filmed the mandals wearing crew barbecuing puppies.
Jayendrar was reported to have grabbed the gold thereafter.
After school he fought with Dudette and she went to the bedroom and locked the door. The lack of attention kills the little guy so he got himself straight and played nice for the rest of the night. Almost.
In addition to the eighteen salads arranged down the middle of the table, there were two more on the table, a salmagundi and a lemon salad, the positions of which I have also marked in green above. In Royal Cookery, (London: 1710), a book of recipes published in Patrick Lamb's name after his death, there is a recipe for Salmagundy. It was a type of salad made with lettuce, finely chopped chicken and anchovies, garnished with small poached onions and scalded grapes. With a whole host of spelling variants over the next hundred years, including Solomon Grundy, it went on to become a popular dish. There are versions of Lamb's original recipe in later cookery books, such as that of Hannah Glasse (1747).
I hope you are all enjoying the season... no matter where you are and what ever type of season it is! Stay warm or cool and enjoy a little sunshine too!
California for a vacation and before she heads off on her journey through the Golden West she will be spending a week, as she puts it “under my tutelage”. That sounds a bit formal, doesn’t it? Yes, we will get to details of collar construction and organza interfacing, but the thought of hours of sewing talk with a fellow enthusiast is quite exciting. I have not inquired but I hope she is a Downton Abbey fan so I can hear all about it from the British point of view. I am looking forward to having a student who is miles past beginner level so we can delve into lots of fun yet tricky details.
If the wireless industry’s march to control the communications spectrum were truly about any sort of looming shortage, you can bet there would be voluntary work on improving receiver performance as of years ago. During the two-year debate leading up to this week’s spectrum auction bill, the issue of making handsets more bandwidth efficient came up approximately never.
- Reduce the size of the collection, styles and different fabrics within it (increasing minimums on fabrics and orders of one style and subsequently reducing costs). By editing and reducing the collection you can focus on a more identifiable product and message, solving both problems = YES PLEASE
These anti-modernist forces are the real common global enemy of civilization in the so called long war begun in this 21st Century. Anti-modernism does not suggest the rejection of technology or machines, as they have utility for all antagonists in waging war. It does suggest the absolute rejection by committed extremists of the decadent fallout of modernity and its various root causes. The subversion of ancient primitive values relating to spiritualism, race, ethnic identity, morality, and societal fairness through modernity and globalization is the trend that anti-modernists combat.
For those of you interviewing, I want to see two sub posts this week titled Pre-Interview Notes and Post-Interview Notes under the heading of your team number and the name of your segment. Publish the first set of notes as soon as you prepare them, and then add the second set to the same post as soon as your interview is complete.
He stood and faced me, a good four inches taller than my 5’10” and looking down at me with a smirk and a stubborn set to his bruised jaw. The green in his eyes sparkled and I felt myself caving already. As soon as he put his hands on my shoulders I knew I was doomed. “I need you to go home and give me a day. Just a day,” he added before I could cut him off with an argument. “I need to do this alone. Let me look over the file and see if it clears up any questions. I promise I’ll call you tomorrow and tell you what I find.”
2010 has come to an end…
Worm
Available from Superdrug and Sleek online. Priced £4.30.
There is no possible way Beltre can hit as bad as he did last year right? He isn’t THAT bad now, is he? Well, I don’t think so. Projections feel the same way. They are looking at him to be about a .320/.430/.750 or so, maybe a bit higher. This would come with a bit less than 20 HRs. Call me optimistic, but I think he can and will do better than this (come on fantasy pick, don’t fail me now). I think he will like Fenway a lot this year. Maybe he can hit 40 2Bs while playing for the Sox. If that is the case, we could see a definite upward trend in that SLG%. Add a few more HRs (also I think possible), and we may see something along the lines of a .325/.475/.800 line from Beltre. I think that that is very reasonable actually. He had a .784 OPS in Seattle two seasons ago, and Fenway is a MUCH better hitting field than Safeco. So, I think he will surprise people to say the least. We all KNOW his defense is going to be good. He could be another gold glover at the hot corner. Yeah, this infield defense is going to be something special to watch I think.
Tanning Bed Safety Tips
Hero Arts - Newspaper background stamp
There is, truly, no other moment we can grasp except now. The past, after all, has already eluded us. On the other hand, talk of the future reduces us to projection about moments yet unrealized.
The beer feels a little on the fizzy side, but you can feel the carbonation making the flavors of the beer burst out and come alive. There is a nice thickness that came as a surprise. Overall I was really impressed by the citrusy, fruit-tinged flavor that was balanced by the pale malts. It's refreshing and easy to drink.
I’m really wishing I’d have just gone ahead and brought my knitting with me today. For some reason I think that might have helped. I could have at least got the gauge swatch done so that tonight I could figure out how many stitches to cast on. But no, I wasn’t in the mood for it then so I couldn’t be bothered. WTF was I thinking…
They will then experience a reception of supreme style and unparalleled service with creative fine-dining cuisine from Gaylord’s award-winning banquet team and exclusive, show-stopping features like a private fireworks display over the Potomac River – Gaylord’s signature “Kiss Goodnight.” A quality wedding venue for local brides.
feel free to email me anytime prior to the end of the contest
I will use the random number generator on Monday, April 30 to select the winner. I would do it on my b-day but no blogging allowed while on vacation according to the hubs!
Yes. That's it. I had guessed it was because they were afraid they'd lose their blessings that they turned to serve and worship other gods. Or that they'd grown lazy and self-confident, too busy or disinterested to seek for and do His will - why bother, things are going pretty well, right? Or maybe, I ventured, it was pressure to accommodate to the "foreigners'" ways (vendors, etc., in their midst) that always helped trip them up. And, I'm still guessing all these things contributed. I know I was guessing partly based on why I turn from God and His "right road" and head for other ways to try and satisfy myself. But here it is, in black and white, if not in bold, the real reason why they (and we) keep tripping up with regard to following God and seeking Him and His ways. Our hearts become prideful and forget Him and what He's done for us. Oh. I hate to think of myself that way. But I find it to be oh, so true in my own life, and probably for others, as well. We're not altogether different from one another in that way, after all.
I desperately need help, preferably of the supernatural kind, as my copy of "What To Expect The Toddler Years" does not seem to cover possession of any kind. In fact, the writers of that exalted tome are not of the opinion that my son is possessed, at all. They seem to think that this behavior is normal for a toddler, which leads me to wonder just how horrible their children are, to lead them to this conclusion. I have had a 2-year-old before, and she never acted like this. I suppose she was saving it up for her teenage years, as she is surly as fuck now.
What path, then, for Pep Guardiola? He has been heavily linked with the Chelsea job but it’s hard to imagine him being given the time to revolusionise Chelsea, nor the ageing dressing room heavyweights buying into his philosophy. A short conversation with Andre Villas Boas should be enough to put Guardiola off. He’s also been linked with the Inter job but it seems they will stick with recent appointment Andrea Stramaccioni for the time being. It seems more likely that Guardiola – who has openly admitted to struggling under the stresses of top level management – will take a break from the game for a year or so to recharge and take stock. He will return to the game at some stage though, be sure of that, and his next move will be intriguing. He has won all there is to win, and has nothing to prove, but you sense he will still want to win it all over again. Chances are he will, too…
I did get the flash working, but I still need a new camera, and to learn how to use it. I am sure Jen cries when she sees these over flashed shots! On the plus side, if you want to buy a horse and like it in my pictures, you will love it in person!!!!
“At a certain point,” Mr. Obama said in an interview in the Cabinet Room at the White House with ABC’s Robin Roberts, “I’ve just concluded that for me personally, it is important for me to go ahead and affirm that I think same sex couples should be able to get married.”
Look she might be the most brilliant woman ever. But if she’s a woman in tech than apparently any one of the office assistants in my building are “women in engineering” or maybe the hardworking folks who empty the trash cans and clean the bathrooms should also be counted as “working in tech”. No? (Photo via creative commons)
I feed Dog scraps of bacon and make sure that he is walked in the morning--no matter how crazy/busy my schedule is. I love Dog and, while I can't exactly say I put him first, I do give his needs and desires serious consideration above my own.
Then beat in the peanut butter and beat together until light and fluffy.
Pam Grier (Jackie Brown)
form of sympathy for his father. But at the edges of this sympathy are unanswered questions that may never be resolved about his father’s hidden life, professional skill and personal motivations that constantly work to shatter Uriel’s attempt to do the right thing. In this scenario, all lives are texts and all texts are as mysterious and ultimately impenetrable as the Talmud itself.
At the Biblical Worldview Summit, participants gain the confidence they need to understand and defend an intelligent Biblical Worldview. They join a network of mentors whose books, writings and personal encouragement sharpen them for life-long leadership. Shoulder to shoulder, they and their new-found friends stand strong together.
Despite the fact that all this scientific evidence makes perfect logical sense, - once you put your mind to it, it still does not explain why the world’s leading scientists, mathematicians, astronomers, archaeologists, engineers, architects, medical specialist, -- you name it, are those who happen to have a deficiency of melanin-producing genes. It also does not explain why some races, such as the Mongolian groups exhibit distinctly different physical features than the rest of us.
None of them had ever stayed away before, well, not unless you counted being on holiday; and she couldn’t figure out where they were all going to sleep. If you’d asked her, she'd have said that she didn’t want to share a bed with her sisters, but she did want to go to bed soon; she thought it might be just like at Christmas, the sooner they all went to sleep, the sooner the next day would come. And then they could all go home again.
Antique Church Altar Salvage
10/25 Omaha, NE @ Universe
Now the two of us are thinking of children who are missed, children who are probably thinking of having their own children .. and we are here at the Bottom of the World.
I will be at Nishmat for at least one year doing general studies and hope to be able to continue there either in or with (depending on timing, etc) the Yoetzet Halacha program. Having spent the past few years working as a Jewish professional while interacting with so many of you via this blog and the social media world it connected me to, I have found a space which calls to me in a deeper way. Discussing these topics feels natural for me, and like a perfect coalescence of my social worker, health educator, and Jewish communal worker selves. Ultimately, I hope to be able to use social media to make taharat ha’mishpacha (the laws of family purity) less scary and more meaningful and accessible.
Fast forward six years and we’re in 2010. I have been on a low-carb diet for six years and lost quite a lot of weight in the process. I’m still sick, but I’m feeling better than I ever have. I no longer eat sugar and I stay away from everything white as far as humanly possible. I do, however, eat a lot of processed stuff. Because it’s cheaper. Or so I keep telling myself. You know the whole “burgers are only 99p but salads £5” nonsense. I keep having my yearly flare-ups when my immune system decides it would be fun to attack a few joints and try to eat them. This year, I’m struggling as the last flare-up lasted longer than ever and saw me well into the late spring. I could walk with crutches (and stubbornness) for about three months and then another flare-up kicked in. By November I was in a wheelchair and I’ve been more or less stuck there ever since.
"Did you know that every time you close your front door, you’re sealing yourself in with airborne dust and allergens? In fact, according to the EPA the air inside your home may be up to 5 times more polluted than the air outside. And like Mother Nature, you have to move the air to clean the air. Oreck’s new air cleaner, The DualMax™ Air Purifier, has the power of a tower in a compact design to move and clean more air than ever before."
So I wrote it down, crunched the numbers. The below image talks about one entry for each game:
We consistently do nothing with our ideas.
Santa Jr. ... Hallmark Channel ... 3 PM
2 misshapen
Weakness: Who is the Shockers “go-to guy?” Wichita St has a number of players that can score, but who gets the ball when the game is on the line. This is an important question as there will be a moment in the tournament where the Shockers will have to decide.
Broadcast – XQD Memory Cards New Pro Media formatted as UDF that records XDCAM HD MXF files or FAT to record .MP4 XDCAM EX files j.mp/uu0hkW
9:45 AM update – Yes, we were out in this craziness… Luke is scared out of his furry pants… By the way if any brave soul wants to help me pull weeds at the Old Baldwin trailhead I’ll be down there at 9:30 AM tomorrow (Saturday). Bring gloves.
You can have it all
For me it is time for a little break now with a cup of tea and with cake (remember, it is one of my New Year´s resolutions to eat at least one piece of cake a day ;-)
Some won millions, and even the least fortunate hauled in $130,000.
When we first walked in, we tried all the light switches and none of them would go on. Actually NOTHING in the room had power. We looked around, trying to figure out what was up. My brother finally realized that right inside the door, there was a slot that looked like your room key went into, so we put tried it out and BANG instantly everything had power. Very interesting concept as well as very creative! You can never leave anything on in your room because it requires your key to be in the slot in order to power the room.
I knew when I saw this I was going to get all Die-licious all over it, and I was so tempted to use my butterfly embosslit, but I knew I couldn't resist my new toys.
BBQ Blog PartyI just learned about a BBQ blog party going on at Coming Down the Mountain this weekend. Be sure to pop in and find some other new blogs. I'm bringing fried chicken and pop. What will you bring? Go on, get over there now.
It is for these reasons that many today, feel they have to go to a church, a synagogue, a mosque, to say their prayers. Many feel they are the more holy if they make a pilgrimage to what they refer to as a holy city. Along the same lines, there is a feeling that one has to be with fellow Christians in order for God to honour the prayer and Matthew 18:20 is used for support.
Getting really excited for this one. I love working on stuff for anthologies. So far I’ve participated in two of the three “Fables for Japan” volumes. And it is an experience I’ll never forget. So when I was turned onto “Futuredaze,” I knew I had to submit something. Not only is it an anthology, but a YA SciFi one at that!
Backgrounds, Embellishments, Word Art and more... for FREE!
When they lost contact with the outer world they succumbed to utter despair.
Publish the giveaway on your blog or elsewhere and leave a way to contact you. Contest will close Feb 7
One of the best birthday presents I have ever received is a single strand of pearls. They came in a velvety box with a set of matching pearl earrings, and I wear them every chance I get. There’s something about pearls, the way they seem to radiate light from within rather than reflect existing light, the way they sit cool against my collarbone, the smooth perfection of their surface. Pearls are gorgeous, elegant,timeless.
Lord, teach us not to put any blames when our life is currently going through this page of this chapter. Teach us to remember that You were, are and will always accompany. Living in You doesn’t guarantee 100% problem-free, sadness-free, or worriness – free, but one thing that has always been so real, that is You are around. You are so near, waiting for us to come to You, to kneel and to cry together with You.
Do you know of other movies that feature letter carriers or postal workers? Tell me about them!
I finally figured it out. At long last, I know why I haven’t been able to update this blog over the past few months.
It may be a no brainer, but I always waited until my cookies were more of a tan--but once they cooled the tan turned to rocks. So, they should look almost done when you pull them out. They should still be white if you want soft cookies.
This month’s Writer’s Digest is the annual self-publishing spotlight, and the grand prize winner, Kingdom of Simplicity by Holly Payne. In the magazine article, she tells how the manuscript was rejected by several publishing houses, but rather than give up on the story, she launched her own imprint and publish the novel herself. In addition to the WD honor, Kingdom of Simplicity received the Independent Book Publishers Association’s Benjamin Franklin Award for best first fiction from a new press. My friends, that is no walk of shame, that’s proudly strutting.
5 – Enjoy – Your not about to fight Mike Tyson, so smile between rounds and partake in the camaraderie of most gyms.
Not being a mother, I was taken aback by my connection to a story about a mother trying to relate to her child. But, then I realized that my connection to the material was from the other side—a daughter to mother connection. Colby delivers a
One-Eighty. Grab crotch. Lip-Sync.
After making a decision to abandon journalism and writing in 1908, Paterson’s remarkable versatility was demonstrated further during the First World War, during which he served as an ambulance driver and honorary vet before rising through the ranks from officer to major. After his return to Australia Paterson went back to his poetry and journalism, which he kept up until the end of his life. One of Paterson’s best-known poems is "Waltzing Matilda" (1895), a traditional bush ballad which has become the unofficial national anthem of Australia. Paterson was known for his ardent nationalism and deep attachment to Australia’s land and folklore, and the majority of his writing reflects these sources of inspiration.
In conclusion, Scripted is not just strong musically, but lyrically as well. Some would say their sound is a mix of the popular female-fronted rock bands Flyleaf and Paramore, but Icon for Hire has a certain quality that makes them stand out from the crowd, and that is the undeniable honesty in their lyrics.
Angelo Marc Jandugan has since deleted his Facebook page. Before he did so, he reportedly posted a lengthy apology on Facebook:
I hope you will get out and check out this great fair, lots of cute items! Please remember to be safe & Happy!
Ben Savage ... Carl
Photos courtesy of H-D and Richard Drew/AP.
First, the sweeping use of “black church” should give pause — as though “black church” means something ideologically uniform (or uniform in any other way for that matter), as opposed to churches attended predominantly by African-Americans. This is precisely the religious and political stereotype of African-Americans to which so many African-Americans and others deeply objected when Rev. Jeremiah Wright was portrayed as typical of the “black church.”
I suppose it’s time to discuss the house: the blue house mid-block. It was never a beautiful house, never gorgeous beyond belief. It was well kept, and had a nice front yard with a rose bush next to the window, but it wasn’t anything to look twice at.
King: Woman, how dare you use Azlah’s name! You shall be killed for doing such!
Reflex and defense,
from Hallmark press release-
The frogs, Gaia be thanked, are prospering, though back in March I'd worried about their survival. There was a spell of hot weather during which a couple of them came out of the murky depths and sunbathed on the patio, and soon thereafter a mass of eggs was seen floating on the water. That was succeeded by a week of hard freezes during which frogs and eggs disappeared, never, I feared, to be seen again.
... okay.
Notes on the DVD
~ used dryer sheets (yes! go ahead and use them for your laundry first!)
Redhill
Thanksgiving is my favorite holiday of the year. There is no religious reason behind it, and therefore, it's widely celebrated by almost every individual. I love the idea of giving thanks to those around you. I am thankful for my family, friends, health, and all of my readers.
Bruce was signing autographs for fans in New York yesterday when the conversation turned political.
One of the tasks involves the titular verruca:
I don’t think I have very many readers here. Whether it be on wordpress, blogger or on facebook. But that is not important to me right now. I mean having readers is great yes, and I hope that what I write is helpful to someone, but it is not exactly why I write. Do you know what I mean?
In conclusion, let us try out the above account on a possible criticism of it.* Someone might say: 'I have no more difficulty regarding the falling of the rain outside my window and the growth of plants inside on the windowsill as one event including them both than I have in regarding the falling of the rain and the continued growth of the lawns on which the rain falls. But I regard the former pair as not causally connected, and the latter pair as causally connected. Therefore is not at least the account of the idea of causal connection inadequate ?'
He added that he has been very ‘cautious’ with what he posted online and he is doing so from the perspective of an ‘independent’ political observer. Mr Goh is currently not a member of any political parties and he has been actively proffering his ‘unique’ views on the notorious Sammyboy Forum (not the PORN site).
B: What inspired you to initially create your own animated Doctor Who series, and what do you hope your series can offer fans?
I could hear Harry thinking.
Six: To shine and shine and shine. Lot’s of windows, mirrors, acrylic and glass is gorgeous – and requires a horrific whole of cleaning and maintenance. Horrific? How about unending? beauty comes at a price and often that price is time spent maintaining. Granted, this is not an issue with the help of a cleaning service, I know. But for do-it-yourselfers, it can be problematic. I love windows and cannot write without a vista. But, I pay for it too. My windows can only be cleaned by professionals who bring ladders and insurance. Shine comes at a premium.
- If I truly understand this law of life, I will have complete control of my destiny:
April 28th holds an even more special place in my heart than Cooper's birthday (April 26th). It was the day we received the unofficial news that Cooper had cystic fibrosis after being wheeled out of our room before discharge papers were signed. He had a bowel obstruction.
Do please check out the link over on the right to BLOOD WILL TELL. That isn’t just a pretty image of the cover.
That's going to be hard actually, because there's so much that happens in this book that is major important, and it leaves very little I can talk about. I would say this is probably the most important book in respects to Kaylee's life so far. It's a turning point in the biggest way possible. Everything's changed. Everything. And it's brilliant!
Get out and do something fun and enjoy all the beauty that Nature has given to us!
grass stabbing upwards
We are still considering the idea, trying to get used to what it means to our family and just how much it will change things, better or worse. Part of me still can't believe this is even being considered. It's a lot to wrap my mind around.
When I asked for the ones I wanted, the seller tells me “Oh, but there´s almost no difference between them”. If you paint miniature figures you should probably know, like me, the huge difference that exists between a 0, a 00, and a 3/0 brush. “It´s all in the details” I replied. And that´s what makes this hobby so beautiful.
Tell us a little about your main characters. Who was your favorite? Why?
evolved into just a little of this and a little of that...
Due out November 9, 2010
This compilation groups together a number of rarities from Tomorrow, a band that only recorded one official album during its lifetime, but played an essential role in the rise of the British psych scene. The second half of the album is comprised of live recordings from "Christmas on Earth Continued," a psychedelic event held at London Olympia that also featured The Jimi Hendrix Experience, Pink Floyd, Traffic, The Move and Soft Machine. Apparently, The Who were also scheduled to play but never bothered showing up.
“I had to throw you out last night as you had had too much to drink,” he answers.
that when
No don’t worry I have not won anything, (not likely to) and I haven’t gone mad (totally!) When I was thinking about today’s topic, two things popped into my head.
3. Like–can’t believe like is still around. This word is so like , you know old. It’s like from the 1980′s Dude.
“My flesh and my heart may fail, but God is the strength of my heart and my portion forever.“
I returned in the afternoon on the appointed day to find Perry and Patrick (the owner) in the front office, Patrick on the phone to a supplier. The conversation appeared to revolve around a piece of equipment needed to complete the installation process. From the discussion, it was evident that no brewing would take place this day.
Before we announce the Eighth challenge we need to announce the winner of the Seventh challenge "Spring has sprung"
After all, what's the worst that could happen?
According to my first impressions, Spanish culture was unhealthy. But I was quick to judge the Basque Country because they didn’t focus on the food groups like Americans do. As I spent more time in Spain, I understood their diet was more about socializing and Spaniards weren’t as uptight about their body image. I soon learned to relax and enjoy the endless bread while I could.
There was a time when a local channel here in the Philippines used to showcase a Burt Bacarach musical special and my dad together with my siblings would gather in front of our cabinet size National Panasonic television set to watch it. Unlike the usual musical shows with glitzy costumes and glaring spotlights, his shows were very different because it showcase his musical composition in progress together with his artists. It was very hard to be in front of the camera, exposing ones' work as artists need lots of space,time and tranquility . Some artists do not even want their work discussed until it had been completed. With Burt Bacarach , he takes you with his journey and since he was a musician, composer, arranger and singer, you get enveloped with his passion, his love for music that when he plays his piano, he conducts at the same time. He was the first composer I have witnessed who had to stand and beat while his head matches with the rhythm. What more, when the composed song had satisfied his meticulous scrutiny, he takes the viewer to the recording studio. So as a child I have witnessed the raw recording of some of his songs , a feat that nobody was able to accomplished until now.
Setting: Grant County, Georgia
When the rice is ready, stir in the butter and sesame oil, and season with tamari to taste. Divide between two or three bowls, and top each with a fried egg or two. Garnish with sesame seeds and maybe some chives or scallions.
Interpretation: I learnt about the power of the written word.
at Chinese New Year instead of holding it for different event.
Fugazi
In honor of Prom 2012 we’re taking a look at some of our favorite movies that feature proms. Old, new, good, bad, we’re reliving all the magical moments of movie proms.
Some day I would do as much as I could, rather than as little as I could get away with.
He was replaced by Jeff Beck, ushering in a much more creative era for the band. This is when the band began moving in more jazzy and psychedelic directions. It's my favorite era of the band. Soon, Jimmy Page joined - as the bass player - but soon moved to guitar. And then, Jeff was canned. Page's version of the band was pretty cool, but pretty much overshadowed by what he turned the band into - The New Yardbirds, later known as Led Zeppelin.
I believe it was the writings of Henri Nouwen that first made me think about the blessings of Jesus as the stages of healing. This has also been part of my journey. His ways are not our ways. Jesus’ kingdom is a kingdom upside down.
Truth is I never stop long enough to care, I cannot let myself, and I will not let myself. The risk is just too enormous and from where am standing there are no returns, at all. Caring for another human being, letting your heartstrings play to the sound of their heart beat, I call bullshit. Why would I let myself loose myself in another person only for me to feel let down if and when the other person does not live up to the idea I had of a perfect relationship?
Connar turned to him, a curious expression on his face. “You know those two?”
The Oregon coast have changed a great deal since the first time I was there 25 years ago. And unfortunately most of the changes are not for the better. Many of the popular towns have become overcrowded with expensive condos, heavy traffic and people. In our quest to find a more secluded beach, we discover an amazingly beautiful small cove with many surfers catching turquoise color waves.
She looks stunned!
And all because I love getting presents. ^_^ Sometimes growing up is overrated.
In a haze of lots of not so sure, instabilities with diverse and far removed believes, a start to a new day, the sun rising as if the east was made special by its luminance. But it brings no warmth.
You all know I've been super busy lately, and I haven't been writing that much here, I've just published pics and some basic information. Now I feel like writing some deep thoughts so here we go... :P
What People Are Saying:
Right outside of the Badlands is Wall, SD, home of Wall Drug! Wall Drug advertisements began right as you cross into SD. It's ridiculous! Wall Drug was started in 1931 and in '36 after bad business being a drug store in a middle of nowhere town the owners wife had the idea to advertise on the highway and offer free ice water. Which in that time was really innovative. From the offer of free ice water, Wall Drug is a massive conglomerate with tons of stores inside, along with a dinosaur garden, and plenty of jack-alope gifts. I've been there every time I've driven thru SD and it's never disappointed. You can read more about it here. And of course they still have free ice water.
If you have received this e-mail in error or wish to be removed from the distribution list please hit the (unsubscribe) link below and then delete the message. We have taken precautions to minimize the risk of transmitting software viruses but we advise that you carry out your own virus checks on any attached message. Please be advised that USDLA and its affiliates do not sell mailing lists or provide customer information to other organizations. Your e-mail address is used to maintain member and customer contact information and provide notification of new distance learning, education and training news, activities and events.About USDLA
It’s a simple fact that the more people there are involved in the approval of any campaign, the less chance there is of the end product being outstanding. Too many cooks really does spoil the broth of creativity.
We are told that the killing of Adam is the only muti murder ever to have occurred in Europe, however, given that large numbers of immigrant children vanish without trace each year, how can we know that is true? Certainly there are troubling numbers of African children in Britain being abused and terrorised by their families who believe them possessed by demons right now, so how do we know that others are not being sacrificed by sangomas?
Much love to you!
* To raise my boys to be strong, secure, well rounded men with hearts for Christ
O Father, please—
THEY WERE OFF!
To distract me from my lack of cervical progress, I've been knitting. In fact, I've finished a few things!
What does affect our daily lives? Food. The toughest thing, not for me but for him perhaps is to be with someone who eats meat. I am someone who kept a rotisserie chicken in her fridge and loved Korean barbecue. When I used the slow cooker in the house to make my black bean and turkey chili, he dejectedly said, “the house smells like meat.” Overall he has been very non-judgemental about it so I’m not stopping eating meat for him. What has influenced me though, is a book I read on our 24-hour plane journey.
a few minutes, thus reducing the pressure on your veins. Remember to use
Block unwanted calls on your Android phone with this app – In response to a reader’s question, Jack Wallen recommends a free app he likes for blocking calls on his Android smartphone.
In time the curtain-edges will grow light.
I have been having so much fun with the Simply Adorned jewellery from Stampin' Up!. We made some inserts and a box to keep them in at team training in January. We stamped the box with the Spiced Paisley stamps and Amanda designed a clever way to create the inside compartments.
There’s nothing worse to me than a company packaging what amounts to be the same old device and calling it an update. The new Apple TV is basically the same old set-top box with a couple additions here and there that I don’t particularly care for.
Star love it is for me :)
The lovely Barb, former Stamptacular DT Member,
06 Treshold (To Enter, The Heart Must Break)
In 2009, the average home care worker wage was $9.34 an hour. The average annual wage would thus have been $20,283, assuming full-time, year-round work and no overtime. Barely enough to lift a family of three above the federal poverty line.
To state that there is such a thing
Enjoy your saturday-
The ‘Super Datins’ of Sarawak seem to achieve the most enviable positions at the helm of timber companies, plantation companies and major construction companies, even without qualifications or working hard!
So please do let me know what you think of my altered chair and also if you would like to see a tutorial on how to do this let me know and I will put it on the to do list.
But this word, yada, appears in the Hebrew Scriptures a total of 943 times. And in all but ten of these usages, the word is used in the context of getting acquainted with someone.
Fighting clothes is difficult so can I just say the clothes I like? I like the tomboy style. I often wear clothes like a hiphop boy or suits that have a man-ish or boy-ish feel.
Tom came home at 3:15pm, and at 3:30ish, I went to get the little kids from the bus. I ended up staying and chatting with the girls for a while. The temperature had dropped again! It was super chilly outside! It had even hailed pretty hard earlier! Dang weather! hehe :)
I always compare the aromas of American hops to those of Kiwi Sauvignon Blanc - and here they are, head to head. I'm not sure the cocktail of Cascade, Amarillo, Chinook and Centennial is done full justice by being served on cask. American hops can become brutish thugs in cask beer. Sometimes their power and violence can be breathtaking, but more often it can just be a bit nasty. Carbonation elevates them, refines them, has them swapping studded leather jackets for Thomas Pink shirts and cravats.
Bodies in the sand
Disgusting! At least sites like Game Front show respect to the gaming masses with articles that outline why gamers are upset instead of calling them entitled, spoiled, or just angry. (Link)
and I know you will think I am completely mad for posting Christmas at the end of April ... as summer approaches and the garden is full of birdsong ... but for blog's sake (for completeness of blog's sake) I'm slipping this post in to remind myself in years to come of the lovely, simple, peaceful Christmas time we had
(49) It (Revelation) employs most of the standard features of that literary genre and was written for the same reason that other apocalypses were written—namely, that author believed his own days to be the worst possible days and thus surely the last days; therefore the faithful were to be encouraged to persevere during this bad time, for their deliverance was soon to come.
ETA: It seems there has been a little confusing with what exactly it is I'm asking, so I'm going to put it slightly differently. If the reader of the possible review is aware of the blogger's "relationship" with the author, should you review if there's the possibility that the reader will doubt your honesty if the review is positive?
Morning Has Broken
Hialeah and Representative Michael Bileca of Miami, is seen as a “gesture”
I also made a cute little card to go along with it and added a sentiment to the heat protective sleeve.
The sparks that fly between them are hotter than ever. Good thing they have a real-life mystery to focus on: why people all around them, including Evan’s new boss, want to get their hands on a journal that once belonged to Kyle’s grandfather.
@dkingpin Tomasz this morning,
What happened was a tangle he calls Bridgen.
Natalie takes a walk, and decides to stop by the school library to research more urban legends, and literally bumps into Sasha, who decided to grab a copy of the Kamasutra. Together, they start reading through the urban legends book and find several familiar stories: there's the story of the person who came home late at night, unaware that there was a killer in the house murdering family members in the dark; the legend that was recreated for Damon's murder; the legend of the gang member deciding to kill the teenagers who flashed their headlights at him...you get the idea.
Something about this night had him tossing and turning.
His face was bland, beatific. 'It never is fair.'
I do the bare minimum of housework required to keep our apartment fit for playing and exploring and eating and sleeping. Which is probably even less than you think it is. It still does bother me at times, when my home is really messy, but I wouldn't trade the kids or the fun I have with them for a clean house. Although, if we ever get rich, I might just look into getting that second house. It could be nice.
Although we had a fabulous time, It feels good to be home with my fur baby I missed Buddy so much.
Their spiel went like this: ”Have you noticed how everything seems a little impersonal nowadays? We’ve all become user names, reference numbers and IP addresses.
Since I have way too much time on my hands I figured I could a) do homework, b) do actual work, c) drink more coffee or d) torture you with more idiotic posts. So here I am with a list of things that are stupid.
4.Roll dough into rectagular shape.
The original costume for the 11th Doctor was ".. a bit more piratey, big long coats and all that stuff- and Matt hated it all".
The next day, I attended John Taylor Gatto's workshop. I find what he has to say very interesting, though I don't agree with all of it. He's very Libertarian, and I'm definitely not, so I found myself feeling uncomfortable with some of the surrounding assumptions and beliefs in many of his statements. Regardless, I really enjoyed his talk, and found that he seemed like a genuinely nice guy. Not arrogant at all, and very friendly.
Bradley remembered of her time at the Brooklyn Paramount: “The audience reaction was always very good. I don’t remember any tearing of clothes or anything like that. The crowds weren’t riotous like the bobbysoxers later on. Russ was so good looking, with a great voice. He was much more a romantic type, but Bing was the one I was crazy about.”
Groweth seed and bloweth mead
It’s time. Out with the old and in with the new.
Article 3 The Ministry of Agriculture shall be responsible for the supervision and administration of the safety of places of origin of agricultural products.
The Seattle area’s premiere dog walking and pet sitting service continues to grow and expand. If you’re a passionate pet pro, we want you on the Sniff Seattle team!
He broke 6 world swimming records as a vegetarian
So finding healthy meals that make the whole family happy can be a struggle. I know without a doubt that Brendan would choose to eat McNuggets every single night if the decision on "What's for dinner?" was left up to him!
Old issues of Beyond the Tracks – this was the little newspaper I wrote and put out for my friends and neighbors.
I threw a blanket around me because I was getting chills.
The Maya called this dark-rift the Black Road, or the Road to the Underworld. They seem to have imagined it as a portal to another world, and their prediction that the December solstice sun would re-enter its ‘birth canal’ in 2012 now appears to be fairly accurate. This special time, in Maya numbers, occurs at the end of one Great Cycle or 13 baktuns: the date 13.0.0.0, from an origin in 3114 B.C. Each baktun numbers 144,000 days and 13 baktuns equals 1,872,000 days since the beginning of Creation.
If you don't want to play along to win, but you like what you see and want it NOW, click the blinkie to the right for $10 off My Memories Suite and use the code below the blinkie. Using that code will also give you a $10 off coupon for downloads, so that's $20 in savings. Pretty good deal.
in light of that,
It feels like an age since I got inky and collaged some stamps together. This has to be one of my absolute favourite ways of using ink and stamps as the results are always unique. I really enjoyed mixing and matching these stamps from various sets and makes. I then sponged in Blushing Bride pink (SU) and distressed the edges. I double cut the sentiment label with the new Framelits again from SU.
use where ever he goes, and an expense account that is rumored to be well
PML (N) not only succeeded in forcing Musharraf to resign but they also got the NRO rejected. When the PPP reneged on their promise to restore the Judiciary, PML (N) went for the option of Long March and the results are in front of the nation.
Return of the native
Most interesting discovery of the day was that Johann Andreas Lieberberg was mayor of Vienna in the year yonk. Anna’s maiden name is Liebenberg. He also got a statue.
He was burdened to learn that most people brought their “pain” to the Lord; fear, anger, confusion, disappointment, hurt and broken hearts. Most members of the church seemed to be suffering. He realized that all of us carry certain pains and are trying to make sense of them.
4 And the king talked with Gehazi the servant of the man of God, saying, Tell me, I pray thee, all the great things that Elisha hath done.
Summer of love,
My brain constantly looks at things from different angles, view points, etc. I can usually find a better way to do something. I consume large quantities of new words. I can create a mental 3-D image of anything that I read about and rotate it to see it from all angles. I can see a picture of just about any crochet project and recreate it. The problem is that I cannot get my brain to stop long enough to complete an idea or mental image. When I do get a firm grip on an idea or thought I hang on to it with a death grip and then it is like hanging on to the leash of a large dog that is running away. I’ve got it, but now what do I do with it. When I do complete a project I often cannot remember how I did it.
7. As a kid your favorite thing to do/play was?
Rated is from China Glazes much coveted Kaleidoscope collection. I have quite a few of the colours myself, but I have put off wearing them until the sky clears and I can enjoy them in their full glory. The thing is... Rated is gorgeous even on a cloudy day. Heck, I didn't even mean to be wearing it, I was supposed to swatch a few colours and started with applying Rated on four nails. It quickly made it's way onto the last six, and before I knew it, I was making a ring to match it as well.
MH: Besides the Milkweed Triptych what else are you working on?
Everyone is screaming. It must be William “What is up with this Anglo-Saxon name” Levy next. Cheryl Burke is making good use of her rehearsal time by choreographing a dance that she really was hoping would be performed in her bedroom because it’s all about William feeling up her thighs and her making faces like she’s in the throes of a mind-blowing orgasm. Yet, William is actually not dancing. At all. He stands still for ninety percent of the “dance” and during the remainder of it, he just sways his hips. Big deal. Even my cats could do better than that. Thank you once again to Len who says, “Everybody watching could move their hips back and forth like that.” I am expecting some low scores, completely deserved. Instead, my mouth drops in shock as a horny Bruno gives a ten. A ten! That’s a blasphemy!
I mean... I love, LOVE the smell of books (when my nose isn't stuffed up) and I spend half the time I'm holding a (print) book oogling over the paper and gently flippin' the pages, not to mention I NEED PRINT BOOKS TO TAKE WITH ME FRIDAY TO THE SPRING INTO THE FUTURE TOUR TO GET SIGNED so there's no question that I love print books. Of course!
Grease a large baking dish with 1 Tbs. of the vegan butter. Add half the potato mixture in an even layer. Then add the spinach and spread it out over the potatoes. Add a pinch of nutmeg to the spinach. Add a layer of the Monterey Jack cheese. Lastly, add the remaining potato mixture and spread it out evenly.
5) CEA License – After about 4-6 weeks from the date you registered yourself with CEA, you will get your license. You can use this time to start getting your tools ready and buying stuff (eg iPad, Handphone, chargers, pens and stationary materials, files, organizers, diary etc). I am not including the costs of these items as these may vary greatly depending on your requirements.
B: "Unscroove"
“To Grimsville, Idaho?”
Rent you’r car with driver for the MIPIM 2012 special package From 1-Wed. 4 April 2012 four days at disposal 800 kms inclus and two Nice airport transfer (Package start from 2800 Euros for you’r car with driver E Class Mercedes or Van/Mini Bus Mercedes )
Detroit is a shock, and a harbinger. The residents of Minneapolis or Boston should not flatter themselves that 'it can't happen here'-- it already is-- nor those of the Whitopias of Portland or Seattle. Urban America is gravely ill: Misguided post-war racial policy has brought us here. What visionary policy-maker shall bring us out?
All day long may I walk
2.) Removing Fear -
b) the middle finger of the right hand (the left was unlucky)
No. The problem here is far greater than individuals and institutions. It's all about 'the system'. And from my view point, the system is failing on every level.
1. Bought a new car. Good times.
What did i do wrong
This was a birthday card I made for a friend's two year old kid whom has been potty trained for a while now with no concludent results...lol. I really know what that means because mine is 2 and 7 months now and we're still dealing with that.
The green knit shell (it's sleeveless) was thrifted for $6.00, the belt was purchased at the Vintage Fair for $2.00, and the tights are another pair I picked up at Esprit some months back. Oh, and the necklace is new-to-me too!
Curly fries
1 1/2 cups chopped fresh dill weed
Ready to move in: Police vans lined up ahead of the operation, which is investigating the alleged sexual exploitation of girls as young as 11
Colin is fairly amusing compared to Natalie Portman.
"Dad, cancel my allowance immediately, rent my room out,
...because...
Wow, it's been nearly a week since my last post! I had just planned to take a couple days off over the long weekend. Well then I ended up getting Miss A's cold, which soon turned into a lovely sinus infection. Yuck!! Needless to say, with my head and face hurting from sinus pressure, the last thing I want to be doing is sitting at a desk, looking a at computer monitor. So Frivolous Fashion Friday will have to wait until next week. Along with a few other things I wanted to share.
Here's a picture of the place that brought back a lot of memories.
As the bar filled over the next 2 hours a definte division formed with a Nappy Valley developing in the lowered area. Getting from the table to the toilet became a mission, weaving round strollers, toddlers and their parents all blocking the passageway to the toilets.
Now... on to the next issue.
DRESS: NYU ~ FaMeshed Dress ~ China Pink (exclusive for FaMESHED)
“Well, we have two bottles of oil,” Olja said, “that should be enough to keep us for a while.”
TheRogueTheatre.org.
And we need to remember for precisely reason Moses gave Israel for the pyrotechnics at Sinai—“ Do not be afraid. God has come to test you, so that the fear of God will be with you to keep you from sinning” (Exo 20:20). Right after the writer of Hebrews speaks of our boldness to enter the presence of God, he says this—
Yep. With a wolf.
Inside the tiny studio, which is kitted out with a battery of microphones and computers, sits Amir Shai, the 42-year-old founder of RadisIN.
Yeah, conservative critics . . . . like the Washington Times. Way to stand behind your politics, guys.
Polymers, Innovation and Development
Somehow, my boys snuck out without my knowledge while I was drying my hair. Keep in mind that one was pantless, and the other was dressed for Easter but barefoot. I panicked when the boys were gone, but I finally spotted them several yards down the road, retrieving Tucker and bringing him home.
Featuring the Electric Auto Association of Northern Nevada (EAANN), the Kiwanis Bike Project, wheelchairs, scooters, 30 other booths and, of course, RTC buses. http://www.wildwestbusroadeo.org/
Woodland Foods spent four hours creating this beautiful mosaic of their specialty ingredients. They procure hard-to-find ingredients from 45 different countries ranging from mushrooms, specialty rices, exotic fruits, and pastas. This year’s catalog features no less than 13 kinds of sun-dried tomatoes.
Then, on the rare occasion that the van actually parked somewhere, the guy getting out had bad, green prison tattoos and that crazy Travolta-like smile.
Q3: Are all departing councillors being given iPads?
Not that women aliens dominating men from frame one to frame last would have made Queen Of Outer Space any better. For one thing, I doubt Zsa Zsa Gabor could have dominated anything more than a traffic cop.
As I type, she sleeps peacefully against my chest. Now and again I take a moment to stroke her full head of hair, kiss her soft spot, and breath in her baby scent. So precious.
My question is, without knowing the particulars of Mr Amors case and set in a broad context, is it not really the case anymore that it is for individuals to take offence for themselves? It would seem that two of the three people concerned had an association based on knowing each other and that the remark made was within the acceptable perameters of their friendship. In such a case there would appear to have been no offence caused.
For anyone with vinyl siding, there's a possibility that you could simply remove it and paint your house! I talked to a few of my neighbors who told me the former owner installed the vinyl siding because the house needed a paint job and adding vinyl siding made the house maintenance free for the elderly owner.
they stand proud and tall,
Lopez
Stone Brewing Co. Stone 07.07.07 Vertical Epic
This has resulted in an increase of business-class energy efficient services, such as audio conferencing, web conferencing, and video conferencing solutions, as well as residential energy management and automation services (which is predicted to become a huge new profit opportunity for providers). In fact, earlier this week, ABI Research, a market intelligence company specializing in global connectivity and emerging technology, reported that carrier involvement in the residential energy industry might even aid in moving almost 12 million units of home automation systems by 2016.
There was a pre-event opening party, the night before, but 'no friends McChuwy' wasn't invited.
Perhaps the government are still of the Josef Goebbels school of thought – that if you “repeat a lie often enough the people will believe it!”
Najib also said the job fair not only offered employment opportunities for fresh graduates but also for those who wanted to switch jobs and a platform for those looking for financial options to start business.
My qualifications make it look easy to choose, right? Teach. But I’d been doubting my choices. Do I even want to be a full-time teacher? Does it fit the bill for the lifestyle that I want? Will it swallow up all of my time, preventing me from doing all the other things I love?
What obscure forces, he was thinking, push humanity to set off such killing sprees?
It’s easy to lose faith at times in the human race isn't it?
Pink goggles from Sinner, because I’m a girl and I like pink
rear wheel drive in winter,
I chuckled not because I don't admire the effort, because I do. I still believe that the truth about nature versus nurture lies somewhere in between, and that my own efforts at gender-neutral parenting have borne fruit as my child enters her teenage years; definitely female, but not always stereotypically so. I chuckled because it struck me as the kind of thing I would have tried when I was a brand new teacher, discovered it was like trying to push water uphill, then abandoned it in the interest of choosing a battle I could actually win.
Which is probably why, as a teacher, I've received more candles and lotions that one person could possibly use in a lifetime.
“Yeah, if I already bored of you, I’ll kill u immediately.”
For in the name of the Lord I will destroy them.
*we talked about our lives now
Brilliant idea! I have just made my pledge. I would love to see photos and videos of this in action. It ticks all the right boxes for me as a way of creating an innovative and engaging community-building event. Talk about responsible tourism!
The plot took off after the matriarch and central star of the theme park Hilola Bigfoot passed away, in turn marking the decline of the theme park.
And if you feel like donating to the cause of preventing the trafficking of children for sexual purposes, I would like to suggest ECPAT USA.
"What's Eatin' You" - 3:36
He said Gomez has also convened a Board of Inquiry that will look into the incident, including possible lapses. The BOI will be headed by Col. Rey Labanin, deputy commander of the 502nd Brigade.
So I have added more tasks to my already too long project list and am feeling a little overwhelmed and under financed. There are things that need to happen in order for the next thing to happen. And so on. I am trying to plug away - at a snail's pace moving towards solving each issue. In the meanwhile I am living in a messy chaos.
Yesterday we had our first NYC pack walk! Five pitties and five humans braved Central Park for our first walk. We learned a lot of things we did "wrong" but we know one thing went right: Havi was totally confident in her pack. I know sometimes it seems Havi is the perfect pup (which she is), but she has major leash aggression issues. Well, the second Havi started walking with her pack, she was golden. She didn't act out or even bother to play with any of the other pitties. She knew she had a job to do, and that was to walk with her pack. She seemed most comfortable at the back of the pack, with adoptable Pinky from That Touch of Pit.
This week we reviewed Keeping our hands to ourselves by watching the Model Me Video and reviewing the steps. We discussed the reason why we practice this important social skill. And further generalize the skill by relating it to personal space and our comfort levels.
She was born from structure, time, bureaucracy, concrete and wrapped in silence
SEE the learning in EVERYTHING!
According to wikipedia, Shaw "founded the Collegiate Chorale, a group notable in its day for its racial integration."
The Gospel According to Isaiah 53 is from Kregel: Academic and Professional and is a paperback with 336 pages and sells for $27.99
I really appreciate it that you take the time to look at my blog and leave such lovely comments. Thank you each and every one of you. Hugs,
So I finished the second sermon on Jude last night. I got some good feedback, and now feel quite comfortable with the preparation technique and manner in which I am approaching sermons. Using more personal stories as illustrations, which people have said is making an impact, has helped to press home points well.
The challenge at Penny Black this week is - 184 "anything goes" a nice easy one to start the year off. Looking through my stock I realised my male cards were getting a little low so decided to go along with that theme as well. Now I don't usually use grey it's not one of my favourite colours maybe it has something to do with the fact that many moons ago my school uniform was grey and green but on this occasion I felt it added to the masculine feel of this card.
Andre 3000 - 35
He hummed while put the groceries in refrigerator. He look at the vase. “The flower… May be I should buy the fresh one…” He take his wallet but forget to bring his phone.
I needed this one! Sometimes, okay most of the time, I wonder if what I do even matters. Not that I want recognition in front of anyone, cause I don't. I just wonder if I didn't do what I do would it be noticed? Does what I do matter enough to make an impact in anyone's life. Most days I would say no it doesn't. Even if I don't feel like it makes a difference if I am doing something to show Christ's love to someone then it's not in vain and it is worth it.
75 Sit-ups
How I need to be reminded of that sometimes.
For those who want to stalk me even more, just subscribe to this blog.
- Finding the perfect rug/lamp/pillow case
Christian is also not impressed with what Adrien is making, even though he says Adrien is his biggest competitor. The judges seem fine with Adrien, but worry that Christian is out of his comfort zone. For good reason too, because once the time runs out, the judges call Christian out for having the worst dish.
But your penance is part three of the James Hall series! Or to be more precise, the debut Pleasure Club LP Here comes the trick. This album was actually intended to be the third Hall solo album. However, since Hall felt the album was more of a "band" effort he elected to release it under a band moniker rather than a solo project.
Watched all the bitterness burn
(from their website) Fred Wallace, Framingham Town Historian ~ George H. Gordon, a resident of Framingham, and active member of the Boston community in the mid 1800′s, played a prominent role in the Civil War. Until now, however, his contributions had been largely overlooked by historians. The book traces his life from early childhood in Framingham to West Point, through the Mexican-American War of 1846-48. It then follows him through a transition to civilian life as an attorney in Boston, and finally through the tumultuous years of the Civil War. Over 6,000 documents from Gordon’s personal papers (letters, diaries, journals, military records), housed at the Massachusetts Historical Society, were an invaluable resource to the author.
One usually reliable source of mine tells me that Selin's Grove has experienced "the structural collapse of their direct-fired kettle" on January 1st. It "shattered like glass" while water was being heated in it. Terrible thing to happen on the first day of the new year.
God, there is nothing better than walking the city streets with an ex-resident when she's as much into books as you are! Some people like to bar-hop... We love to get our bookshop-hop on! So what about you? Have you been to one, or more, of these bookshops? Which are your favorites? Did I miss one that you absolutely adore?
So far, we have done the following:
I had sought counseling after Dad had died but when I became pregnant, there was a whole other slew of emotions…my Mom had said that Dad had the hardest time dealing with the fact that he would never know his grandchildren. He would ask “who’s going to tell them about me?” Ugh, even writing about it makes me weepy.
4.) ”If you don’t go after what you want, you’ll never have it. If you don’t ask, the answer is always no. If you don’t step forward, you’re always in the same place.”–Nora Roberts
Very important factor for a successful weight loss is to lose the excess weight slowly (no more than 1lb per week) so as to avoid a drop in the metabolic rate (which is the energy we need when we are resting); the ideal is to cut the amount of the intake calories daily by 15% maximum.
Patience, my friends, is a quality you master while traveling (especially in Africa). When you realize that not everything is under your control (see #4) and that the world has its own pace, then you’ll learn to accept things as they come, easier.
it into a 1 by squinting. Aren’t all
(they just all haven't been posted yet)
Here’s what I forgot to add before about dragons:
"Hurry, this way," Derue shouted and lead them across the room to a large iron-bound wooden door. He banged loudly on its panel and shouted to those inside. Something gave a clang from within then a half-dozen orcs pulled the door open using an iron chain. A man stepped out, but Derue pushed him back and turned once more to signal franticly for Gytha to quicken her pace. "Will you hurry, we have wasted enough time already," he shouted.
Gimpel was charmed by these children and came to know each of them well: the “chief”, the eldest in the garrison; his friend, who was conscripted to play the unenviable role of the Boche; and Pépète, who was “small, slightly misshaped, rather scrofulous, looking somewhat like a gnome” but who nonetheless played the part of an ace aviator. At the end of each session, Gimpel would reward the troops with barley sugar, causing all to shout with one voice, “Long live the photograph!”‘
My mom came for a visit, had to be admitted to the hospital next day with chest pains. No heart attack, but diabetes. No big shock, but hopefully motivation for a change for her.
1. Workers that need a card quickly can start immediately and finish in as little as 10 hours.
Rémy de Gourmont, Le deuxième Livre des Masques Revered in the French-speaking world, Marcel Schwob (1867-1905) deserves to be much better known among English-speaking aficionados of Decadent fiction. This new collection of fifty-one stories, including eight newly-translated pieces, aims to address that discrepancy. It brings back into print Iain White’s poetic translations of Schwob’s better-known tales, such as the title story ‘The King in the Golden Mask’, and adds newly-translated gems such as the astonishingly beautiful and haunting ‘The Wooden Star’.
We hadn't actually set out to have a "green" wedding but now that I think of it, we are reusing, repurposing and recycling most of the decorations from what we have or found.
V/A - Unsigned (Epic 1987, comp with Green, New Salem Witch Hunters, The Worms...)
I must end with a note about the Adventure Life travel agency with whom we booked our fabulous expedition. Although the Argentine agency, 'Kallpa' (with whom Adventure Life worked in tandem) skipped a few beats with our diet details, on the whole, the tour was seamless. Our favorite guide was Marta in Puerto Madryn, who was extremely knowledgeable and accommodating. We hated to see her go! Norbie, in Ushuaia, was our second favorite. His jokes along the trail kept us going when the going got tough.
It may seem like a simple question. In the context of the series of questions though, it is a very deep, reflective question. When comparing and contrasting ‘sobriety’ and ‘recovery’ does one really have to go through ‘recovery?’ That’s what it is asking. To which my answer is, “No, sobriety is not enough. Yes, you need to go through ‘recovery.’”
4. Surprise me! Anything goes, but must be within the price restriction below.
(Mother looks at her mirror and seems oblivious to what the other characters are saying.)
I pull again.
A few weeks ago, the kids and I started volunteering at the orphanage a street over from our house. We've gone there many times...so many that when we go there with visitors, at this point they just tell us to go on in and give them a tour ourselves..."you know this place...make yourselves at home" they say. But, we've never gone as volunteers on a regular basis. I knew that when our family got to a certain stage I wanted to do that. I had been thinking about it for several months actually, but didn't know about the risks involved...awkwardness since we are on the list to adopt, plus practical things like lice and scabies, etc. Just me, that's fine...but for my 4 children, I didn't want to put them in that situation if it wasn't for sure the Lord's idea. Well, in January, I knew it was. So, we go every Tuesday and Friday to help with the 0-2 yrs. old age group's end-of-the-day routine...4:30-6:30. And we seriously love it. It is exhausting work (or as Cass says when she leaves there, "I'm jezausted" haha). And there are some incredibly heartbreaking things that we see. But, it is incredibly rewarding and my children are learning so so much.
I sigh. Then I lean down and whisper to the boy.
8. Montee Ball, Wisconsin – Not sure if he can top last years Heisman run, but he’ll get plenty of yards behind the always big and physical Wisconsin offensive line.
8) Gin Tonica
adult-sized, too big to duck inside the inferior vena cava
The world is full of dreamers. Everyone knows people who woke up too late, only to discover that life had passed them by because they never did anything to make their dreams happen. They slept their life away, dreaming one day after another of doing something great, while those who faced reality were busy making their dreams happen.
“My assessment when he arrived was that he was clinically dead, and given that it had been… about an hour (since he was first reported to not be breathing), resuscitation efforts would likely be futile,” she said.
It appears that more readers scratched their heads than chuckled, wondering why First Things would publish such a facile sort of piece that gets so much wrong by an admitted non-expert. Sally Thomas addressed these concerns in detail at Castle in the Sea, focusing in particular on Coffey's assertion to the actual mothers out there that "[it] is perfectly acceptable to say 'No, you’re not doing trombone camp this year, because I have interests and talents that do not involve you, and spending my life in the car prevents me from pursuing them.'” "Only a sociopathic narcissist," Sally counters,
And there we sat, all cuggled up (snuggle + cuddle= Anne’s word cuggle) on the couch with blankets and puppies and boxes of Girl Scout cookies and Adele singing to us, a private concert…a Happy Valentine’s Day. Maybe, after all these years, I am finally getting it.
You know what?
Wasted energy, fewer results
The saga continues. DSK has already said he won’t stand in 2012: but if Sarkozy were to be linked convincingly to an anti-DSK plot, it would still be a matter of celebration on the French Left.
Who can forget the full bodied black lady in Craig Bodeker's excellent film “A Conversation About Race” who, when challenged to explain what she meant when she insisted she saw racism "around her every day" stated that it revealed itself when white people were “too nice” to her. Hence apparently racists can be simultaneously nasty, and too nice, or, at least, that's what they can be if you are desperate to find them.
Monday morning and the door slamming as the boys go for the bus is my cue to start the week - Tim will have left much earlier. Using the weather and set activities like my day at Root and Branch I work out roughly how my week will unfold. Everyone works differently but I get the best out of myself if I only plan for a couple of activities each day. I can really get in to them properly and get things finished. Trying to cram too much of too many different things in my time doesn't work. Something will always take longer to complete. I like to immerse myself in gardening or sewing or whatever it is. And I feel better if I've been able to finish what I set out to do.
PINATA'
15. Open the Books On bourgeois Democracy, argues that the MP's expenses scandal is only the tip of the iceberg. What about all the top officials, what about the top bosses?
Well, my thumbs aching and screaming at me to quite typing. So, for now, I will bid you ado. I have things to do-(like go to the doctor about my thumb and my painfully obvious problem with clumsiness)-and October to get into a good mind-set for. I’ve been in quite a dark place mentally lately, and I’m hoping to turn that around soon.
Catherine Lough Haggquist ... Clair Flowers
I feel all gooey now.
as she makes her way across a room. When we first
It's official. The local paper "The Review" reported the following this morning ....
p87 “This means that the lunar rhythm not only reveals short intervals (week, month) but also serves as the archetype for extended durations; in fact, the ‘birth’ of a humanity, its growth, decrepitude (‘wear’), and disappearance are assimilated to the lunar cycle.”
April searches Ella’s face.
But even though it’s easy to point the finger and blame the producers of the crap, Amy knows that it’s consumers’ poor spending habits—what and where we buy--that ultimately keep the latest versions of the Chia-Pet in production. The ‘buy-more,’ or even ‘buy-more-than-you-can afford,’ mentality has definitely contributed to the growing levels of consumer debt in our society.
Organised sea swims are becoming increasingly popular in Cayman, as evidenced in the record number of people – 700- who participated in last year’s one-mile Flowers Sea Swim along Seven Mile Beach in Grand Cayman.
Pastels run into darks
As I'm in the process of making myself a new 18th century gown, I though I would share a bit of my research as well progress on the gown itself. Which, um, I haven't actually started as of yet. The fabric is however, washed, dried, and ready to go!
There is a difference between the subconscious and the unconscious. The subconscious is memory; it is a storage house, so to speak, of your memories of your feelings, thoughts, actions, and experiences in this lifetime. The unconscious, on the other hand, is comprised of ancestral memory. Let’s say it is inherited memory, and every human being “inherits” the same unconscious contents. It is also correct to say that the subconscious is the personal unconscious, and the unconscious is what makes you a part of the collective unconscious. It is just a matter of semantics.
Gerry Johnson as Betty Rubble
When the bad stuff happens to you, it's time to make a choice. I won't be the one to tell you to keep going—the only one who can decide that is you. But you must choose a path. When you get here, to the really hard stuff, you can't stand at the fork in the road without losing it. Choosing a path makes it a little easier, because you're going somewhere again. Maybe it's not how or where you want to go, but it's something. And sometimes that something can turn into loveliness.
I've spent some time thinking about this, I've spent time listening to the originals of the songs the Midtown Men imitated. One thing was clear: You could actually hear the words. And the melody. They were both important. Just not at the same time.
Whispering in the back of your head, tainting all the joy and fun of the last day of your weekend.
Pipsqueak’s eyes rounded in shock, and he launched off the crate. “You’ll be in for it when I tell Maverick what you said!”
the premise according to the commercial is that a model dies (she’s blonde and i imagine is supposed to be attractive, but didn’t do it for me) and is then reincarnated into the body of a fat woman. and she lives happily ever after. i guess.
Garudasana - Eagle Pose
About the closest they came was 1962's The Brain That Wouldn't Die, where that poor old doctor Kurt (Leslie Daniels) got his arm ripped off by "the thing in the closet", albeit out of camera view and in black and white. It was still a messy scene, though.
And yes sometimes in ‘that moment’ you’ll doubt, regret and stress…
Readers have their quirks, and some don't mind the endless reams of description. However, as a character driven writer, I'd rather spend time developing the interiority and emotion responses of the characters than delving into a blow by blow of the architecture of the house on Grosvenor Square.
Africa Court of Women
I can't estimate the calorie content per serving, but the whole pot is only 760C with milk and 660C without... so divide it up as you will
I went up to the counter and nervously asked the cashier if he’d seen my brother. Tall guy, brown hair, green jacket. Drove a red Civic? “No, sorry, don’t remember anyone like that.” I asked if there was another 7-Eleven close by, maybe he went there instead? No. Closest one was about 12 miles away in Bradford.
The expansive woodlands of northern New England and upstate New York have long supported a vital forest products industry, provided habitat for abundant fish and wildlife, and are home to rivers and streams that supply water for the populous cities of the Northeast. Dozens of collaborative partnerships exist within the landscape ranging from the New England Governors Blue Ribbon Commission on Land Conservation, which addresses conservation on a multiple state-scale, to single watershed or sub-watershed collaboratives. Federal agencies have worked in partnership with states and local stakeholders for years to focus and combine their resources in a number of targeted areas where opportunities exist to maximize the conservation benefits of federal funds.
Mary Director
We’ve had several days of badly needed rain, and the the hill where I live is a verdant oasis. This afternoon while reading on the back patio, I saw a bird that I can’t identify even after pouring through the bird books. My husband’s having a go at it as I write this, and George is lying on his back on the living room rug, gently squeezing one of his stuffed animals.
Adapted from The Upper Oven.
Mitchell A. Australia's move to the plain packaging of cigarettes and its WTO compatibility Asian Journal of WTO and International Health Law and Policy 2010;5(2)
“We cannot generate true passion for God by an act of will. No formulas will produce the passion we’re after. Seasons of fasting, regular time in the Word, disciplined resistance to temptation, generous giving, exuberant worship–these are all good things, but they are not enough to fill us with passion for Christ.
Former Sunday Telegraph editor Sir Peregrine Worsthorne has written “even Hitler would not have treated ordinary people with such cruelty.”
We get our ads from Google's Adsense program.* Some of these advertisers may use technology such as cookies and web beacons, which will send these advertisers information including your IP address, your ISP , the browser you used to visit our site, and in some cases, whether you have Flash installed. We are told that this is generally used for geotargeting purposes (showing New York real estate ads to someone in New York, for example) or showing certain ads based on specific sites visited (such as showing cooking ads to someone who frequents cooking sites).
The finishing spree continues. This top has been in the works since... drum roll... 2006. Now it's finished, got all its borders, and they fit nicely. Don't judge by the pictures... this is unpressed, hot off the machine! I am inordinately pleased to have it at this stage.
I am watching our neighbors son Luka for a few weeks while his normal babysitter is out of commission. The boys get along pretty well, but have their spats from time to time. Neither one is a very good sharer, so that causes problems. Here they are reading their books.
a teenager, a five year old child, a man or a woman, a boy or a girl
She cares for and about him. Genuinely.
Analyses of autism rate data published by SCPI identify 3 clear change points in U.S. autism disorder trends: 1981, 1988 and 1995, all of which the groups claims roughly correlate with the use of vaccines (Meruvax, MMRII, and Chickenpox) that were cultivated with the use of tissue from aborted children. The group says that it has been unable to identify any other factor that might correlate to the change in autism rates.
One may have overslept and may have awakened at 4:28 AM. Please forgive one Lord Jesus. One may have confessed one’s sins, thanked the Lord and prayed for the sick.
It will still be a few days before Grief: The Great Yearning appears on Amazon in print and Kindle, and a few more days before it shows up on B&N, Apple, and the various other ebook sources, but my part is finished. And suddenly, I don’t want to let go.
I made the best soup if I say so myself . I baked a complete package of chicken breasts and as I was putting them in the freezer I used oneof the baked breast and made my a pot of chicken soup. I put in the pot with the chicken pieces, some fresh kale, fresh carrots, onions, fresh garlic,rosemary from my plant , butter, cream I had some half & half.
Exodus 33:13-18 (NLT)
When I saw this skirt I KNEW it was perfect for the space. No it was not Coral and Navy. BUT it had Coral and Navy in it as well as a ton of other true bright colors. It was exactly what I needed to bring more life to the room.
stuck in my dream.
Somehow we all survived all the hazards we have faced. I am so so so so so grateful to have grown up in the 50s and 60s and that I have the scars to prove it!
The Hunger Games highlights the dangers of the media and the role it plays in shaping our perception of reality. That so-called reality can be shattered only when we question the stories that are fed to us through the screen and really listen to ourselves and each other. The novel mocks our frenzied need to remain youthful through the ridiculous style of the people of the Capitol. There is little difference between cat-face plastic surgery and dyeing your skin green. All of the circus-like characteristics of those in power are meant to mask the imbalance between the haves and have-nots in Panem – if the masses are kept entertained, distracted and contained, they cannot revolt. But, of course, the rumblings are present despite the Capitol’s efforts with the possibility of war bubbling under the surface.
I find that very sad.
~ It's better to Velcro/Duct Tape/Krazy Glue your kids to their bedroom wall for the summer so that your sanity will stay in tact.
When I finally saw the finish line I was thrilled to see there was an 18 in front of it. My goal was to come in under 20 but I didn't think coming in under 19 was possible right now. So I sucked it up and tried with all my might to pick it up a little and come in at 18:51. Quite honestly I am happy as a clam with that. I have lots and lots of room for improvement but today gave me the confidence that my goals are possible.
It was an amazing visit -- it was a walk among ghosts. But, very friendly ghosts.
I LOVED Reading Rainbow as a kid. I watched it all the time and would love catching the re-runs because I would get a chance to re-read the books.
An Ceann Comhairle: ￼ ￼ I will not repeat this. Will Members please get back to section 5? No across-the-floor shouting, please.
The hassle map of healthcare foodservice -rifle with duplication, inconvenience, poor access to appropriate information is ripe for a change. Should we not look at companies like Apple and Google to see how they are simplifying?
Favorite food: Cereal.
You can search the unclaimed property database 24/7/365 by logging onto www.statetreasury.wi.gov or you can call 877-699-9211 Monday through Friday, 8am-4:30pm and a claims examiner will be happy to help you.
2011 is shaping up to an amazing year for Speculative Fiction at large not just Fantasy although that is looking damn good all by itself. My Sci-Fi list last year was only 7 books long, which grew a little with the year, but it was so short I combined it with UR and Steampunk picks. This year Sci-Fi warrants a post all its own with loads of debuts and returning stars. The people claiming Sci-fi is dying or already dead should shear the wool off their eyes and see what is brewing.
Okay. I might sound like an over-emotional teenager now but I was so upset with a person who did that to me just now. Period.
You know...because I am a responsible parent who is highly concerned about the safety of my children.
Turning one...
“You ever been called a dip s**t at the table of the weekly?”
- SR, Wokingham, 02/3/2012 15:04
cos they love it."
why nature
The police use various means of compulsion to enforce the law. This is what the police do, whether they work for the UCPD, for OPD, or for any other jurisdiction. On campus, they are also charged with enforcing the student code of conduct.
Collbohm and other pioneer managers at Douglas gave RAND its commitment to interdisciplinary work and limited its product to written reports, avoiding applied or laboratory research, or actual manufacturing. RAND’s golden age of creativity lasted from approximately 1950 to 1970. During that period its theorists worked diligently on such new analytical techniques and inventions as systems analysis, game theory, reconnaissance satellites, the Internet, advanced computers, digital communications, missile defense, and intercontinental ballistic missiles. During the 1970s, RAND began to turn to projects in the civilian world, such as health financing systems, insurance, and urban governance.
And then I read about Northumbria Police and their Deputy Chief Constable, Sue Sim.
bloody no life.
into -- they want to get rich, they
Evidence retention issues are a red-headed stepchild to begin with. Labworkers see it as beneath them, and a hassle; district clerks are often ill-equipped for the job; and historically the evidence room is where police departments assign either the disabled or sometimes problem officers who can't be trusted on the street. Charley Wilkison of CLEAT has boasted to me that quite a few local police associations have been organized out of the evidence room because disciplined officers assigned there decided to unionize. The professionalization of evidence retention has only really begun in the last decade or two and only in the largest departments (of necessity). Wrote Johnson:
7/8 tsp. baking soda
Some seem to think that low interest rates are a cure all for everything ailing the real estate market. Certainly the Federal Reserve believes this. Japan has mastered the low interest rate world:
It seems that when I step in ahead of an issue, I try to do so non-verbally. Interesting. Now it is going to be a goal to only step in non-verbally and otherwise to wait and see what happens. Then, I'll wait and see how that goes.
Staff was friendly. We paid a few bucks for drinks and snacks, but it wasn’t like I felt I was missing out on an overly processed, tasteless meal. The staff was friendly and the plane was clean. Really, you can’t ask for much more.
CONTRA: The posts will always be of the same type kwIm? Traditionally Monday is Robp0rn Monday, Wednesday is Robp33n Wednesday and Friday is Anonymous Robcoholics Friday. Yes, we could change that up, but why fix something that is not necessarily broken?
Somehow the last half of that episode got good.
love charm and lace is from local store
It was all fun and games that there was this radical dude, named Jesus, but he actually wanted to change things – and while that sounds nice, I don’t know if I was a person living at the time, if I would’ve liked Jesus challenging me outside of my comfort zone like that.
So to round this out, we've been busy doing a bunch of little things around the house to get it ready to show. Our list wasn't too long, but things never go quite as planned! We took down all the chandeliers in the house and replaced them with fixtures I'd be willing to leave behind. We also did a bunch of paint touch ups and I've gone through so many Magic Erasers cleaning the cabinets and all those pesky scuff marks that inevitably happen. And if we weren't the ones doing to fixing up (there's no way I'm climbing up to clean our 3rd story windows!), we were meeting people at the house to do so. But thankfully, that part of it is done. Now we just have to remember to make the bed everyday in case we have a showing!
(1) In literature, the writer’s chief aim in this passage is to tell a story, not to develop a theological argument.
“14th Entry; Tirdas, 5:20 AM, 8th of Heartfire
Should President Obama suspend the right to assemble, Americans might expect another apology to accompany it in which the commander-in-chief condemns the very act he authorizes. If you disagree with such a decision, however, don’t take it to the White House. Sixteen-hundred Pennsylvania Avenue and the vicinity is, of course, covered under this act.
weken en moanden deur een onbekend land
Fisher elaborated on a set code of ethics provided by the Society of Professional Journalists. The four ethical guidelines are: Seek the truth and report it, minimize harm, act independently and be accountable. He said that when journalists write they should consider if what is written is honest, true and necessary for the report.
Most people I meet know that the pantomime villain policeman image is rubbish. There are three groups who benefit from all of this. Lawyers, criminals and politicians.
There's something about it, isn't there? Something that is so powerful that it speaks, not only to the 13-year-old girl that I was, but the 30-something woman and mom that I am today. I believe that we all have that in us, don't you? The barbaric yawp, only most of us keep it covered up and hidden in some way. Maybe we believe it isn't there. Maybe we doubt it. Maybe we're so afraid that others will laugh at us or not understand or think that we're stupid and worthless that we never allow it expression. WHAT IF IT SUCKS? And then everyone will know. Everyone will know that we have this yawp inside of us and they will know it completely lacks worth.
Ours was not the only such experience; several people travelling at several times on other lines including the N205 and the N4 reported similar tedium and frustration.
I will never understand why news providers care who displays their content because getting it displayed is their reason for existance.
BannerStatus
The human brain continues to be a part that holds a great deal of secrets, because most people do not know tips on how to use it properly plus the power it have the moment they get started to implement it as a result of braintraining.
it is eight thirty and you are taking vitamins
They resemble the operation of cancer bodies.
But now, tonight I think I will go to bed and when the moon finishes its journey
Choppers with 50 in em’
Deiss suggested the world body should get more involved in economic and financial issues and not leave them solely in the hands of forums like the Group of 20 club of key developed and developing nations.
3 Polaroids in the Park 04:04
Private and corporate donations can be made to:
We do not learn anything new from this report as it reiterates what immigration critics have been saying years but it is a welcome one nonetheless since it helps bring attention to an immigration system that may end up doing more harm to Canadian society than good.
cause – his Order of Skull & Bones organization’s only cause for being
The final score board - Big Son (3 wins), MrVV (2 wins), Little Son (1 win) and me - of course I lost all my games.
Once picked, the hops required drying on the day of harvest in Oast Houses, the distinctive white cowls helping to draw air up through the hops. With the decline of the hop industry in the 20th Century (largely due to the importation of hops from the US and China), many Oast Houses have found a different purpose including as private residences, just like the one I shortly pass on my route.
2. Some of your worst days lie ahead. Graduation is a happy day. But my job is to tell you that if you are going to do anything worthwhile, you will face periods of grinding self-doubt and failure. Be prepared to work through them. I’ll spare you my personal details, other than to say that one year after college graduation I had no job, less than $500 in assets, and I was living with an elderly retired couple. The only difference between when I graduated and today is that now no one can afford to retire.
If you want to be reviled in today’s society, just light a cigarette in public.
The image panel is also ivory cardstock. I sponged it with Memento Cantaloupe, Angel Pink, Tangelo, and Bamboo Leaves. I was going for early morning, I'm thinking it might be a little too heavy.. but it'll work for today. I stamped the corner vine with Bamboo Leaves and then stamped the sentiment in the same color. I stamped the vine again on scrap ivory cardstock. I colored the leaves using YG63 and YG67 copics and a little Mint Copic spica for the veins in the leaves. Then I cut out the leaves and pieced them onto the main image panel. That main panel is popped up from the base.
We don’t have to think that way. Kids who get a chance to make their way in the world are doing what children have done since the dawn of time: Growing up, rather than being stunted. Colleges refer to a whole new breed of incoming students as “teacups” — students incredibly fragile, because they were kept inside all the time and handled delicately, like fine china. They’re lovely. But they break really easily.
And I am still debating the oddest thing I saw …..
To sum up, the Internet is very necessary but we have to learn how to use it and avoid all the dangers of usage. We should remember that it’s only a source of information and not a way to search for serious friendship.
It is expected that Iran will make an independent announcement on how it will address these issues.
Well i can't do nothing 'bout that, no
We are not allowed to speak up
I know that Celeryville was named for their chief agricultural product. I wonder if they have a celery festival each year; it sounds like fun!
The procedure for using the current version is:
Often people cite a human-animal bond when referencing the immorality of eating meat. However, it is this human-animal bond itself that makes the eating of domestic species ethical in the first place. Domestication of animals we currently consume started to occur around 8,500 BC. Budiansky argues that “Domestication is a biological process, a phenomenon of evolution and natural selection, not something that we opposed upon other animals” (Call of the Wild 1999). The idea that domestication of animals originally occurred through imprisonment is simply not appropriate.
When she did make a comeback, I just couldn’t relate to her. Blackout was still okay but the last 2 albums, Circus and Femme Fatale are so not Britney! Her voice is heavily autotuned! After listening to hits like Toxic, if i listen to Big Fat Bass, I’m like ugghh!
It’s Monday folks, the week wide open for more bobol and scandal.
Next time you're on the receiving end of social network marketing, stop for a second and consider whether you are being manipulated by weapons of influence. We've all been the targets of influence strategies throughout our lives.
I was playing around with stitch settings on my machine and I had stitched onto some paper, rather than throwing the scraps away, I used them too. Here is a detail shot of the stitching:
When we last check, Ares Lin has made his profile on the Lion City Forum ‘private’ and neither did he post any apology on the forum.
Marianne brought a fabulous green tag for an in store entry, and already took home her green inspired prize :)
Alan Longmuir – Bass
Drizzt and Catti-brie have been away from Mithral Hall for six long years, but the pain of a lost companion still weighs heavily on their strong shoulders. Chasing pirates aboard Captain Deudermont's Sea Sprite is enough to draw their attention away from their grief. Then a mysterious castaway on an uncharted island sends them back to the very source of their pain, and into the clutches of a demon with vengeance on his mind.
When Marshall and Elyse wake up in each other’s arms with zero memory of how they got there or who they are, it’s the start of a long journey through their separate pasts and shared future.
In my situation is kind of “light thinking” since i already (partially) obtained what i wanted REALLY BAD!
George Gilmore: Polly's Song (Soul To Keep)
I started making this for the MSP Quilting Angels sewing group I joined earlier this year. I really want to finish this one sooner rather than later, so if I can I'll finish this before Judy announces #5. I've made all of the blocks, so I just need to add the sashing, quilt it, and then add the binding. I think I can, I think I can...
I'm learning to do this:
-Brute
Week 55 Die cut
Nor is there anything particularly new about the US military planning gradually to hand over security responsibilities to the Afghan forces, then easing themselves out of the picture. And nor is there any secret that the Taliban expect to have a free run at taking over the country, once the infidels have departed. What else is there to say?
6- It's a waste of beer. It will be sent back in two months (September...still hot) .
I just come from
Radiators and Transmissions
Here, as elsewhere in these parts, the road was perfectly alive with pigs of all ages; lying about in every direction, fast asleep.; or grunting along in quest of hidden dainties. I had always a sneaking kindness for these odd animals, and found a constant source of amusement, when all others failed, in watching their proceedings. As we were riding along this morning, I observed a little incident between two youthful pigs, which was so very human as to be inexpressibly comical and grotesque at the time, though I dare say, in telling, it is tame enough.
Charles Mingus - The Black Saint And The Sinner Lady - 1963
It's getting to be that time of year, when the ghosts and ghoulies come out to play! Well, I know it's over a month away, but when you're swapping ATC's you kinda gotta get going a little early. This idea popped into my head at 3am the other day and I got a chance to put it into action today. I couldn't resist this Halloween themed tissue tape when I saw it at Michael's and I'd been mulling over how to make a mummy with it, when "make a wire form and wrap it" came to me in the wee hours. Some chain tie downs and a mica flake floor and it all came together.
Magic...
Purely coincidental!
I think that's about it for tonight. It's been a long day (it's been a long year!) and I'm worn out.
2009-384 billion Naira
Savitz D, Whelan EA, Rowland AS, Kleckner RC. Maternal employment and reproductive risk factors. Am J Epidemiol 1990; 132: 933-945.
Ensnare my senses
They were very kindly sent to me by this clever lady who is a very talented felter and has just started blogging. I am going to put one in my blog banner when I change it next but meanwhile the girls are enjoying playing with their little mice :)
However, it’s at approximately this point that a modicum of sanity prevails and the writer gets dressed. Usually in her “writing pyjamas”. In case you’re wondering, pyjamas are the fundamental element of a writer’s wardrobe. (I will be putting in several tax claims for pyjamas.)
The Niner Wine Estates have a state-of-the-art and newly LEED Silver certified gravity flow winery and ta elegant stone barn Hospitality Center on the Heart Hill property. It was interesting to taste their young vintages made using the best of traditional wine making methods and cutting-edge technologies.
She had to be captured in motion!
cannot even approach; the punishment
where has it gone when it has gone from me
The mountains are my family, and though they may be distant cousins and aunts, I still know we are somehow related. On fogless days I climb on their backs, as I did when I was a child, so as to get a better view of home.
The next event that will be taking place is a two day blog hop that I will be participating in that is called What I love about Halloween and Fall Blog Hop. This hop takes place on October 7th and 8th. There is a great line up of some talented ladies in this hop you are surely not going to want to miss. Also you aren't going to want to miss a chance at the thankfully yummy blog candy I will be giving away. So be sure you remember to come and hop with us.
As such, I got very excited when I recently learned that Radio Riddler Productions (Fast and Frank Benbini of Fun Lovin Criminals (FLC), who are reggae remix producers in their spare time), are working to pull together a completely reggae tribute to Prince and the 'Purple Rain' album in its entirety (as well as a collection of Marvin Gaye's vocals over reggae music). Rumor has it that the album will feature a variety of artists and singers including members of The Specials brass section, members of Madness, former UB4O singer Ali Campbell (who will be singing 'Purple Rain'), Sinead O'Connor (performing 'I Would Die 4 U') and many more. It certainly doesn't hurt that Benbini is originally from Leicester in the U.K. and is well connected in the British music scenic.
WHO IS BACK in my life after way too long?
Despite the winter weather it’s the 1st of May and so it’s the official start of our Sheffield City Read of ‘Oliver Twist’.
The key to generations
Hope you like them too!
half satisfied,
15. Facetious and abstemious contain all the vowels in their correct order.
Emma chuckled and reached her hands up as if she meant to place them on my shoulders, then stopped herself and dropped them back down to her sides.
“No, i never like her. The one that i love is… you Sooyoung-ah.” Said Jonghyun to Sooyoung while he’s holding Sooyoung’s hand.
One of my future and really exciting projects is writing the story of this amazing family and farm. We were there to work on the proposal. It’s not a cookbook, but rather a food narrative, new for me and a writing challenge I’ve embraced whole-heartedly! My blog deadline came and went last week in all the hub-bub, so I decided it made the most sense to write about and share my weekend at White Oak Pastures.
“And you have just dragged me into this? Oh, don’t look at me like that, Bern… Oh, the hell with you old gazzas. What else am I gonna do? I’ve gotta come now, don’t I?”
DMF is a jump-start discovery approach designed to assist legal teams with implementation of defensible discovery processes for litigation. DMF is a three-part program that: (1) helps examine current discovery practices; (2) offers best practice discovery processes, procedures and documentation; and (3) shares new discovery standards with legal teams in an easy-to-understand presentation format. For more impact, the DMF jump-start program may include a presentation for legal teams that underscores the lawyer’s legal obligations and outlines legal team responsibilities.
It is not revealed if ‘TR Emeritus’ will release the identity and particulars of its contributor ”Matthew Chua” who wrote the article to PM Lee as requested by his lawyers which will surely betray the trust of its loyal readers.
I’d unbutton her blouse to roam hot skin below,
Measure dry ingredients in a large bowl and stir or whisk to combine. Measure wet ingredients in a large measuring cup, jug, or similar, and whisk thoroughly until eggs are beaten in completely and liquid is of a uniform consistency.
We bought an older home hoping to be able to renovate. 5.5 years and quite a number of unfulfilled predictions (by others) later. It hasn't happened.
On the way to the graveyard, while we were still struggling with GPS and crude, shouted directions from passer-bys, my other colleague, who is also an only son, told me to imagine how difficult it would be. Being the only son, losing your father, your sole role-model and life-guide, and becoming a de-facto patriarch of the family yourself. How absolutely life-shattering. I thought about it for a minute. I told him if you keep thinking about it, you’re going to suffer twice. Once through the worry and another (probably) through the real event, God forbids. And it’s not going to make it any easier.
Okay – we all know that we hate those people who bring fish to work for lunch. We hate them – don’t we? Oh we do.
Broadpeak designs and manufactures video delivery components for Network Service Providers deploying IPTV, Cable and OTT services. Its portfolio of solutions and technologies powers the delivery of movies, television programming and other content over managed networks and the internet for viewing on any type of device. The company’s systems and services help operators increase market share and improve subscriber loyalty with superior quality of experience.
He saw a shepherd pass by him as the GPS on his mobile phone indicated he was in Lerna. He hailed the shepherd and spoke up, “Sir, can you tell me where I can find the high draw”
We did some "round and round the garden" tickling games. Little "C" was happy to let Little "R" do this on her and Little "R" was very happy to be allowed to do it!
So, did I miss anything out? What else is the mother of the groom meant to say on a day like this?
FG: 1.011
or tall urns next to a front door filled with silver & purple loveliness.
I have tried to have the, “it happens when it happens approach” but, I feel like I still need to put the effort out there. There are things I want to do, and they won’t just magically fall on my lap. But on the other hand, the stress, the waking up at 3 am thinking, “oh shit, where is my life going?” is slowly killing me, my heart hurts, it yearns for work and social stimulus and love.
The tea menu did end up a bit overwhelming - so we simply asked the waiter for recommendations. I went with a Fruit Mountain Tea milkshake - made with a black tea with "golden asian fruits" ($11SG ~$9US), SO good but pricey, while my parents went for classic hot teas: Genmaicha and Dragon Well.
Illustrator: Maria Kalman
makes about 4 cups or 1 litre
Another piece of outside material, this time from the trio of Auldridge, Nicholson and Trils, “Any Old Miracle” is another slow ballad, this one of a distressed man asking God for a small miracle, this miracle in the form of some help in forgetting a lost love.
“No, no… It was just … I found very early in the morning that the chicken was sitting on Bantum’s chest behaving … strangely… and then he was staring at me … I don’t know… I think perhaps it was a dream…”
Game / Characters: Dark Conspiracy is a GDW game set in a near-future dystopia rife with urban conspiracy and occult horror. This game will be a playtest of a module I am going to submit to Protodimension magazine, which is an ezine for Dark Conspiracy, CoC and other like minded games. Pre-generated characters will be available or if you'd like to get together earlier I can help with the creation of a character you'd be interested in playing. This adventure will consist of players uncovering a plot surrounding the high frequency of apparent kidnappings and outrash of violence in a small suburb of near-future New Orleans.
Once the pod reaches a planet and is exposed to both sunlight and more tolerable conditions, it starts to grow. If a creature comes too close to the pod, it opens up and releases a long shoot, which grabs onto the victim. This infects the victim, slowly turning them into a Krynoid. The victim becomes weak and starts developing plant-like characteristics. At this stage, they still have most of their personality, if intelligent, though they crave animal proteins in order to grow. As time passes, they grow larger and begin to lose all vestiges of their original physical form. Their original personality is lost to the Krynoid sentience.
It was weird. I’ve never actually had a dream like this… and certainly not one where it continued off of the other dream.
Okay-okay, I went abroad again, reasons why I re-color it again,
Many real estate experts thought the Internet would result in more people being able to successfully sell their home without a real estate agent.
“Pretty early on in the writing I realized that mythmaking and storytelling are a way in which people deal with reality. They’re a coping mechanism. In Balkan culture, there’s almost knowledge that reality will eventually become myth.
JoAnne Engebrecht — Professor, Molecular and Cellular Biology
This weekend, we return to the 33-word prompt, but this time, a 33-word prompt with a twist. Your task, should you choose to accept, is to take a scene that involves (or affects) at least three people. You should then write this scene from the point of view of three of the characters, using 33 words for each character.
I completed the story of my art card with a coat of Magic Transparent Pearl Pen over the center triangle of the iris fold design to represent the shimmering water where the mosaic steps disappear further down into the portal!
Since I found a more wide-spread unschooling community a few years ago—a community that I have so many terrific friends in, and that has had such a positive impact on my life—I find my focus shifting to the areas where community in my own life is still, I feel, lacking. A community of those who hold similar radical political beliefs to me, and/or a
An elementary school teacher by the name of Ms. Franchesca Smith, from La Quenta High School, showed her skills as a design-based educator. She taught geometry and English as a second language for kids aged 14 and up. She had her kids build an entire miniature city out of cardboard boxes and milk container, egg cartons, and anything else they could find at home that would otherwise be deemed as recyclable trash. After the city was assembled, she had her students apply all the geometric skills to their city to find the volume of buildings, the circumference of the plots of land, etc. One big slogan of the campaign is to create never-before-seen items – letting the students play with their imagination, in order to make the learning experience more memorable. And it works. As the test results show, students in design-based learning classes do consistently better than others:
According to the US Congress, quoting US intelligence officials, Iran has set up an elaborate gun smuggling network within Mexico and has used Hezbollah to infiltrate the Mexican Drug Cartels. After the United States attacks Iran these agents quickly launch attacks along the Mexico border. The cartels are more than happy to provide foot soldiers for the war because instability means more drugs entering the United States and more profits.
Pack 10:
In any event, she returned alone victorious to the ball, only to be confronted by the King. "You are the jade La Maupin?" ask Louis "I have heard of your handiwork! Need I remind you of my decree against duels in Paris?" She denied nothing, for how could she? She was well known and had clearly been the center of everyone's attention. It would seem however that she did present herself to Monsieur who interceded for her.
- 1 cup pumpkin puree (canned is fine, but fresh is better)
The beauty and majesty of the earth not only testifies of God, but it testifies that He is such a loving God. Of course, we needed a place for our mortal experience, a place where we could be tried and tested, a place where we could learn. But it didn't have to be such a beautiful place, did it? Certainly, God could have skimped a little.
“You seem to be a devote of Edgar Allan Poe.”
I'm just so torn.
Tenaganita subsequently held consultations with the Ministries of Home Affairs and Human Resources on the cheating and exploitation of these workers, and the corruption in the system. To date, the State has not acted on the information given by Tenaganita. Instead, in 2011 amendments to the Employment Act were made, changing the definition of “employers” to include “outsourcing companies”.
Item #: CWW-M1201-4
That's why when you get to Turkatron, you're hearing for The Hussy what is the equivalent of a 4track cassette demo for crying out loud. It's got all the attention to detail of the bigger tracks, but the physical whallop is more restrained, and it's what makes b-sides throughout history so god damn important. Here's an early incarnation of this massive sound, but how they get from there to "Undefined" is anyone's guess. Heather gets familiar with the reverb back off in the distance under a little thinner drum track and takes the reins on this brief number.
If he has any shred of decency left, hiding in the murkiness of his soul, he would step down now, for the good of the cause, and halt the callous betrayal of so many good people.
There is another problem with how this system operates. Arrivals are very peaked. Again look at the table. The number of passengers at 11AM to Noon is about 1/6th the number at 2 to 3P. Nature doesn’t force things to be that way. That is all about how airlines schedule flights. I would guess that this is all driven by most passengers leaving Europe in the late morning since getting to Heathrow at 6:00AM or landing at Chicago at 10:00PM is a tough sell. Still, airlines could help this problem greatly by tweaking their schedules so CBP sees a more uniform flow over the day.
I finally feel like things are coming together. This was the bottleneck, so to speak.
When I could I spent us much time near the tree-line as possible, staring in. I watched the Guardians fight when the occasional wolf came to steal a chicken. I practised the movements they used with a long stick. My coming of age was close approaching. I’d need all the knowledge I could get. I had become determined… infatuated with the idea of making it through the Forest. I dreamed of what lie on the other-side. For me it was always some kind of paradise. Warmth, and a treeless clearing stretching for miles. Hills of grass as far as the eye could see.
In a small bowl, place water, yeast and a pinch of sugar. The water temperature is important. If it is too hot then the yeast will die and if it is too cold then the yeast will not activate well, if at all. I used a thermometer at first and now I can tell by feel. Allow to stand for 7 to 10 minutes. The yeast is alive if bubbles start to emerge which will build up to a foam covering the surface of the mixture. This process is called proofing the yeast.
The Verdict: Yeah, I normally go for the doom the more nuanced/experimental/"artsy" varieties of metal. But occasionally, I need to scar my eardrums with batshit-crazy bludgeoning. This scratched that itch nicely. I give it 4 out of 5 stars.
Williams Hybrid Power is hoping to be able to commercialize their KERS system for other vehicle applications. Teaming up with the Qatar Science & Technology Park, the two partners will go forward as the Williams Technology Center to work on R&D with commercial goals.
Oh my.
I think I only bought the Indus because it was in a four-for-a-tenner deal in my local branch of The Beer Club and what I was really after was the brewery's old ale Old Dan. Dan had a tough act to follow. I was expecting something much darker than this red-amber beer, which proved quite gold around the edges and topped by a pale beige head. The first sniff gave me boozy sherry or calvados and the taste is pure fruitcake: plums, raisins, cherries and a great big glug of alcohol. More than 33cl would be hard to take, I reckon: the flavours and the thick syrupy texture build up on each other until it starts to get quite cloying. As an after dinner liqueur substitute, shared perhaps, it's wonderful.
A central, national agency responsible for receiving (and as permitted, requesting), analyzing and disseminating to competent authorities, disclosures of financial information:
I tend to do a lot of YA, but I suspect that is because YA is having a bit of a moment and there is a lot of it out there. I commission right through from picture books to YA fiction, so this editorial remit is reflected in the services I offer via Smart Quill.
I honestly cannot remember the last time i made a mental note to watch something on TV which was not a sports event. Have the productions of larger-than-life shows just stopped??
So, without further delay, here's the roll call for my character's I grew up with, probably around age 8 to age 15. There were many more, of course, but these are some that I remember...
